North Carolina, session 2025, HB1114.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REPEAL CHAPTER 143A, THE OBSOLETE 1971 REORGANIZATION OF
THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
SECTION 1. Chapter 143A of the General Statutes, as amended by Sections 2
through 4 of this act, is repealed.
SECTION 2.(a) Chapter 147 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 3E.
"The Lieutenant Governor."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 143A-13 is recodified as G.S. 147-33.131 in Article 3E of
Chapter 147 of the General Statutes, established in subsection (a) of this section, and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 147-33.131. Office of the Lieutenant Governor created.
There is hereby created an The office of the Lieutenant Governor.Governor is created. The
Lieutenant Governor shall serve as President of the Senate and perform any additional duties
assigned by the Governor or the General Assembly. The Lieutenant Governor shall maintain an
office in the Hawkins-Hartness House located at 310 North Blount Street in the City of Raleigh.
The office shall be open during normal working hours throughout the year."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 147-33 is recodified as G.S. 147-33.132 in Article 3E of
Chapter 147 of the General Statutes, established in subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3.(a) Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 85.
"Council on the Holocaust."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 143A-48.1 is recodified as G.S. 143-815 in Article 85 of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, established in subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 4.(a) Chapter 106 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 82A.
*H1114-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"Forestry Council."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 143A-66.1, 143A-66.2, and 143A-66.3 are recodified as
G.S. 106-1005, 106-1006, and 106-1007, respectively, in Article 82A of Chapter 106 of the
General Statutes, established in subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 5. Article 1 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143C-1-6. Types of State agency transfers.
(a) Type I. – A Type I transfer is a transfer of an existing State agency to a principal State
department. Under a Type I transfer, all of the following apply:
(1) The State agency's statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions,
including its management functions, are transferred to a principal State
department.
(2) The State agency's records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds are transferred to the principal
State department.
(3) The State agency's powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking,
regulation, licensing, setting rates and standards, and rendering findings,
orders, and adjudications are transferred to the principal State department.
(b) Type II. – A Type II transfer is an intact transfer of a State agency to a principal State
department. Under a Type II transfer, the transferred State agency shall be administered under
the direction and supervision of the principal State department but shall exercise its statutory
powers and functions, other than its management functions, independently of the head of the
principal State department. The State agency's management functions shall be performed under
the direction and supervision of the head of the principal State department.
(c) Management Functions. – As used in this section, "management functions" means
planning, organizing, staffing, directing, coordinating, reporting, and budgeting."
SECTION 6. G.S. 147-3(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The general civil executive officers of this State are as follows:
(1) A Governor;Governor.
(2) A Lieutenant Governor;Governor.
(3) Private secretary for the Governor;
(4) A Secretary of State;State, who serves as the head of the Department of the
Secretary of State.
(5) An Auditor;A State Auditor, who serves as the head of the Department of
State Auditor.
(6) A Treasurer;State Treasurer, who serves as the head of the Department of
State Treasurer.
(7) An Attorney General;General, who serves as the head of the Department of
Justice.
(8) A Superintendent of Public Instruction;Instruction, who serves as the head of
the Department of Public Instruction.
(9) The members of the Governor's Council;Cabinet.
(10) A Commissioner of Agriculture;Agriculture, who serves as the head of the
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Affairs.
(11) A Commissioner of Labor;Labor, who serves as the head of the Department
of Labor.
(12) A Commissioner of Insurance.Insurance, who serves as the head of the
Department of Insurance."

PART II. REPEAL PROVISIONS IN CHAPTER 143B CONCERNING THE OBSOLETE
1971 AND 1973 REORGANIZATIONS OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
Page 2 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7. The title of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Executive Organization Act of 1973.Branch."
SECTION 8. The following provisions in Chapter 143B of the General Statutes are
repealed:
(1) G.S. 143B-1.
(2) G.S. 143B-2.
(3) G.S. 143B-5.
(4) G.S. 143B-7.
(5) G.S. 143B-9(b).
(6) G.S. 143B-13(e).
(7) G.S. 143B-19.
(8) G.S. 143B-21.
(9) G.S. 143B-22.
(10) G.S. 143B-23.
(11) G.S. 143B-25.
(12) G.S. 143B-26.
(13) G.S. 143B-28.
(14) G.S. 143B-51(b).
(15) G.S. 143B-53.
(16) G.S. 143B-138.1.
(17) G.S. 143B-168.3.
(18) G.S. 143B-168.10C.
(19) G.S. 143B-181.1(b).
(20) G.S. 143B-216.33(b).
(21) G.S. 143B-219.
(22) G.S. 143B-279.3.
(23) Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
(24) G.S. 143B-348(b).
(25) Part 8 of Article 8 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
(26) G.S. 143B-368.
(27) G.S. 143B-431(a)(2) and (3).
(28) G.S. 143B-432.
(29) G.S. 143B-451.
(30) G.S. 143B-801.
(31) G.S. 143B-1203(a).
(32) G.S. 143B-1490(b).
SECTION 9. G.S. 143B-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-3. Definitions.
As used in the Executive Organization Act of 1973, except where the context clearly requires
otherwise, the words and expressions defined in this section shall be held to have the meanings
here given to them.The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Agency: whenever the term "agency" is used it shall mean and include, as the
context may require, an existing Agency. – A department, institution,
commission, committee, board, division, bureau, officer officer, or official.
(2) Board: a Board. – A collective body which that assists the head of a principal
department or his or her designee in the development of major programs
programs, including the tender of advice on departmental priorities.
(3) Commission: a Commission. – A collective body which that adopts rules and
regulations in a quasi-legislative manner and which acts in a quasi-judicial
capacity in rendering findings or decisions involving differing interests.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Committee: a Committee. – A collective body which that either advises the
head of a principal department or his or her designee or advises a commission
in detailed technical areas.
(5) Council: a Council. – A collective body which that advises the head of a
principal department or his or her designee as representative of citizen advice
in specific areas of interests.
(6) Division: the Division. – The principal subunit of a principal State department.
(7) Head of department: department. – The head of one of the principal State
departments.
(8) Higher education: education. – State senior institutions of higher learning.
(9) Principal State department: one department. – One of the departments created
by the General Assembly in compliance with Article III, Sec. 11, of the
Constitution of North Carolina."
SECTION 10. G.S. 143B-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-4. Policy-making authority and administrative powers of Governor;
delegation.Governor's role.
The Governor, in accordance with Article III of the Constitution of North Carolina, shall be
is the Chief Executive Officer of the State. The Governor shall be is responsible for formulating
and administering the policies of the executive branch of the State government. Where a conflict
arises in connection with the administration of the policies of the executive branch of the State
government with respect to the reorganization of State government, the conflict shall be resolved
by the Governor, and the decision of the Governor shall be final."
SECTION 11. G.S. 143B-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-6. Principal State offices and departments.
In addition to the principal departments enumerated in the Executive Organization Act of
1971, all executive and administrative powers, duties, and functions not including those of the
General Assembly and its agencies, the General Court of Justice and the administrative agencies
created pursuant to Article IV of the Constitution of North Carolina, and higher education
previously vested by law in the several State agencies, are vested in the following principal
departments:
(1) Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.
(2) Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) Department of Revenue.
(4) Department of Public Safety.
(5) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-83, s. 48, effective June 26, 2012.
(6) Department of Environmental Quality.
(7) Department of Transportation.
(8) Department of Administration.
(9) Department of Commerce.
(10) Community Colleges System Office.
(11) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-83, s. 48, effective June 26, 2012.
(12) Department of Information Technology.
(13) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(14) Department of Adult Correction.
(15) State Bureau of Investigation.
(16) State Highway Patrol.
(a) Offices. – The principal State offices are as follows:
(1) The Office of the Governor.
(2) The Office of the Lieutenant Governor.
(b) Departments. – The principal State departments are as follows:
(1) Community Colleges System Office.
Page 4 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Department of Administration.
(3) Department of Adult Correction.
(4) Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
(5) Department of Commerce.
(6) Department of Environmental Quality.
(7) Department of Health and Human Services.
(8) Department of Information Technology.
(9) Department of Insurance.
(10) Department of Justice.
(11) Department of Labor.
(12) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(13) Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.
(14) Department of Public Instruction.
(15) Department of Public Safety.
(16) Department of Revenue.
(17) Department of State Auditor.
(18) Department of State Treasurer.
(19) Department of the Secretary of State.
(20) Department of Transportation.
(21) State Bureau of Investigation.
(22) State Highway Patrol."
SECTION 12. G.S. 143B-9, as amended by Section 8 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-9. Appointment of officers and employees.Governor's appointment of department
head.
(a) Department Head. – Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, the head of each
principal State department, except those departments headed by popularly elected officers, shall
be appointed by the Governor and serve at the Governor's pleasure. The The Governor shall set
the salary of the appointed head of each of the principal State departments shall be set by the
Governor, and the salary of the chief deputy or chief assistant to the department head. The salary
of elected officials shall be as provided by law.
…."
SECTION 13. G.S. 143B-13(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Each member of a commission created by or under the authority of the Executive
Organization Act of 1973 this Chapter shall be a resident of the State of North Carolina, unless
otherwise specifically authorized by law.
Unless more restrictive qualifications are provided in the Executive Organization Act of
1973, this Chapter, the Governor shall appoint each member on the basis of interest in public
affairs, good judgment, knowledge, and ability in the field for which appointed, and with a view
to providing diversity of interest and points of view in the membership.
The balance of unexpired terms of existing commission members shall be served in
accordance with their most recent appointment.
A vacancy occurring during a term of office is filled in the same manner as the original
appointment is made and for the balance of the unexpired term, unless otherwise provided by law
or by the Constitution of North Carolina."
SECTION 14. G.S. 143B-16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-16. Appointment and removal of members of boards, councils councils, and
committees.
Unless more restrictive qualifications are provided in this Chapter, the Governor shall appoint
each member of a board, council, or committee on the basis of his the member's interest in public
affairs, good judgment, knowledge knowledge, and ability in the field for which appointed, and
with a view to providing diversity of interest and points of view in the membership. Unless other
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
conditions are provided in the Executive Organization Act of 1973, this Chapter, any member of
a board, council, or committee may be removed from office by the Governor for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or nonfeasance.
No member of a board, council, or committee may use his the member's position to influence
any election or the political activity of any person, and any such member who violates this
paragraph section may be removed from such office by the Governor, if such member was
appointed by the Governor, or by the appointing authority, if such member was not appointed by
the Governor. member's appointing authority. Nothing herein shall prohibit such in this section
prohibits a member from publishing the fact of his or her membership in his or her own campaign
for public office."
SECTION 15. G.S. 143B-17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-17. Commission investigations and orders.
Unless otherwise provided for in the Executive Organization Act of 1973, any in this Chapter,
a commission created by the Executive Organization Act of 1973 this Chapter may order an
investigation into areas of concern over which it has rulemaking authority, and the head of the
department required to give staff support to such the commission shall render such provide any
reports and information as the commission may require. information requested by the
commission. In default of the production of information by the head of the principal department
or any employee or agent thereof, requested information, the commission may seek the aid of
petition the Wake County Superior Court to require the production of information as hereinafter
provided.the information.
In proceedings before any a commission or any a hearing officer or member of the
commission so authorized by the commission, if any a person refuses to respond to a subpoena,
or refuses to take the oath or affirmation as a witness or thereafter refuses to be examined or
refuses to obey any lawful an order of a commission contained in its decision rendered after
hearing, the chairman chair of the commission may apply to petition the Superior Court of Wake
County or to the superior court of the county where the proceedings are being held for an order
directing that the person to take the requisite action. Should any If a person willfully fail fails to
comply with an order so issued, this order, the court shall punish him as the person for contempt."
SECTION 16. G.S. 143B-49 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-49. Department of Natural and Cultural Resources – creation, powers powers,
and duties.
There is hereby created a department to be known as the "Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources," with the organization, duties, functions, and powers defined in the Executive
Organization Act of 1973.The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is created. The
Department has the powers and duties defined by law."
SECTION 17. G.S. 143B-50 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-50. Duties of the Department.
It shall be the duty of the Department to do the following:The Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources has the following duties:
(1) To provide the necessary management, development of policy policy, and
establishment and enforcement of standards for the furtherance of resources,
services services, and programs involving the arts and the historical and
cultural aspects of the lives of the citizens of North Carolina.
(2) To provide and keep a museum or collection of the natural history of the State
and to maintain the North Carolina Biological Survey.
(3) To develop and preserve libraries, historical records, historic sites and
property, and an appreciation of art and music."
SECTION 18. G.S. 143B-51(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The functions of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall comprise,
consist of, except as otherwise expressly provided by the Executive Organization Act of 1973
Page 6 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
this Chapter or by the Constitution of North Carolina, all executive functions of the State in
relation to the development and preservation of libraries, historical records, sites and property,
and of an appreciation of art and music and further including those prescribed powers, duties,
and functions enumerated in Article 17 of Chapter 143A of the General Statutes of this
State.duties described in G.S. 143B-50."
SECTION 19. G.S. 143B-63 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-63. Historical Commission – members; selection; quorum; compensation.
The Historical Commission of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall
consist of 11 members appointed by the Governor.
The members of the North Carolina Historical Commission shall include the members of the
existing North Carolina Historical Commission who shall serve for a period equal to the
remainder of their current terms on the Commission, plus four additional appointees of the
Governor, two of whose appointments shall expire March 31, 1979, and two of whose
appointments shall expire March 31, 1981. At the end of the respective terms of office of the
members, their successors shall be appointed for terms of six years and The term of a member is
six years. Members serve until their successors are appointed and qualify. Of the members, at
least five shall have professional training or experience in the fields of archives, history, historic
preservation, historic architecture, archaeology, or museum administration, including at least
three currently involved in the teaching of history at the college or university level or in
administering archives or historical collections or programs. Any An appointment to fill a
vacancy on the Commission created by resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member
shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Commission from
office for misfeasance, malfeasance or nonfeasance according to the provisions of G.S. 143B-13
of the Executive Organization Act of 1973.malfeasance, or nonfeasance, as provided in
G.S. 143B-13.
The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary
of Natural and Cultural Resources."
SECTION 20. G.S. 143B-68 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-68. Public Librarian Certification Commission – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The Public Librarian Certification Commission of the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources shall consist of five members as follows: (i) the chairman chair of the public libraries
section of the North Carolina Library Association, (ii) two individuals named by the Governor
upon the nomination of the North Carolina Library Association, (iii) the dean, department chair,
program director, or equivalent of a State or regionally accredited graduate school of librarianship
in North Carolina appointed by the Governor, and (iv) one member at large appointed by the
Governor.
The members shall serve four-year terms or while holding the appropriate chairmanship. Any
position. An appointment to fill a vacancy created by the resignation, dismissal, death death, or
disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Commission from
office for misfeasance, malfeasance, and nonfeasance according to the provisions of
G.S. 143B-13 of the Executive Organization Act of 1973.or nonfeasance, as provided in
G.S. 143B-13.
The members of the Commission shall receive per diem, diem and necessary travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
A majority of the Commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary
of the Department through the regular staff of the Department."
SECTION 21. G.S. 143B-72 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-72. Tryon Palace Commission – members; selection; quorum; compensation.
The Tryon Palace Commission of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall
consist of the following members: 25 voting members appointed by the Governor, nonvoting
members emeriti appointed by the Governor, and five voting ex officio members as provided in
this section.
The Governor shall appoint 25 voting members. The terms of the initial members shall be
staggered as follows: Nine of the members shall be appointed to serve four-year terms, eight of
the members shall be appointed to serve three-year terms, and eight of the members shall be
appointed to serve two-year terms. At the end of the respective terms of office of the initial
appointed members of the Commission, the appointments of their successors, The terms of
members, with the exception of ex officio members and members emeriti, shall be for terms of
four years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a
vacancy on the Commission shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. The Governor shall
designate the chair of the Tryon Palace Commission. The other officers of the Tryon Palace
Commission shall be elected by the members of the Tryon Palace Commission.
The Governor may also appoint any a person who has previously served on the Tryon Palace
Commission with distinction to the Commission as a member emeritus. A person appointed as a
member emeritus shall be is deemed a lifetime member of the Commission and shall serve as a
nonvoting member.
In addition to the members who are appointed by the Governor, the Attorney General, the
Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources or the Secretary's designee, the mayor of the City of
New Bern, the Dean of the College of Arts and Sciences at East Carolina University, and the
chairman chair of the Board of County Commissioners of Craven County shall serve as voting
ex officio members of said the Commission. The provisions of the Executive Organization Act
of 1973 G.S. 143B-13 pertaining to the residence of members of commissions shall do not apply
to the Tryon Palace Commission.
A majority of the voting members of the Commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of business.
The members of the Commission shall serve without pay and without expense allowance."
SECTION 22. G.S. 143B-73(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) The U.S.S. North Carolina Battleship Commission is authorized and
empowered to adopt such rules not inconsistent with the management
responsibilities of the Secretary of the Department provided by Chapter 143A
of the General Statutes and laws of this State and this Chapter that may be
necessary and desirable for the operation and maintenance of may adopt rules,
not inconsistent with the duties of the Secretary of Natural and Cultural
Resources, to operate and maintain the U.S.S. North Carolina as a permanent
memorial and exhibit commemorating the heroic participation of the men and
women of North Carolina in the prosecution and victory of the Second World
War and for the faithful performance and fulfillment of its duties and
obligations."
SECTION 23. G.S. 143B-74 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-74. U.S.S. North Carolina Battleship Commission – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The U.S.S. North Carolina Battleship Commission of the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources shall consist of 18 members including the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources
Page 8 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and the Secretary of Commerce who shall serve as voting ex officio members. The members of
the Commission appointed for terms to end in 1991 shall serve for an additional two-year period.
At the end of the respective terms of office of the members of the Commission serving in 1991,
their successors Members shall be appointed for terms of four years and until their successors are
appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the
resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired
term. The provisions of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 G.S. 143B-13 pertaining to the
residence of members of commissions shall do not apply to the U.S.S. North Carolina Battleship
Commission.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Commission from
office for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with the provisions of G.S.
143B-13 of the Executive Organization Act of 1973.nonfeasance, as provided in G.S. 143B-13.
The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business. The Governor shall designate from among the members of the Commission a chairman,
vice-chairman chair, vice-chair, and treasurer. The Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources
or his the Secretary's designee shall serve as Secretary of the Commission. The Commission shall
meet at least twice annually upon the call of the chairman, chair, the Secretary of Natural and
Cultural Resources, or any seven members of the Commission."
SECTION 24. G.S. 143B-79 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-79. Executive Mansion Fine Arts Committee – creation, powers powers, and
duties.
(a) There is hereby created the Executive Mansion Fine Arts Committee. The Executive
Mansion Fine Arts Committee shall have The Executive Fine Arts Committee of the Department
of Natural and Cultural Resources is created. The Committee has the following functions and
duties:
(1) To advise the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources on the preservation
and maintenance of the Executive Mansion located at 200 North Blount Street,
Raleigh, North Carolina;Carolina.
(2) To encourage gifts and objects of art, furniture furniture, and articles of
historical value for furnishing the Executive Mansion, Mansion and to advise
the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources on major changes in the
furnishings of the Mansion;Mansion.
(3) To make recommendations to the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources
concerning major renovations necessary to preserve and maintain the
structure;structure.
(4) To aid the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources in keeping a complete
list of all gifts and articles received together with their history and value;value.
No
(5) No gifts or articles shall be accepted for the Executive Mansion without the
approval of the Committee; andCommittee.
(6) The Committee shall To advise the Secretary of Natural and Cultural
Resources upon any matter the Secretary may refer refers to it.
(7)(b) Notwithstanding Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, G.S. 143-49(4), or
any other law pertaining to surplus State property, the Committee may dispose of property held
in the Executive Mansion after consultation with a review committee comprised of one person
from the Executive Mansion Fine Arts Committee, appointed by its chairman; chair; one person
from the Department of Administration appointed by the Secretary of Administration; and two
qualified professionals from the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, Division of
Archives and History, History of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, appointed
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
by the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources. that Department. Upon request of the
Executive Mansion Fine Arts Committee, the review committee shall view proposed items for
disposition and shall make a recommendation to the North Carolina Historical Commission who
shall make a final decision. The Historical Commission shall consider whether the disposition is
in the best interest of the State of North Carolina. If any property is sold or leased, the net
proceeds of each sale or lease and any interest earned thereon on the proceeds shall be deposited
in the State Treasury with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Executive Mansion, Mansion
Special Fund, Fund and shall be used only for the purchase, conservation, restoration, or repair
of other property for use in the Executive Mansion."
SECTION 25. G.S. 143B-80 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-80. Executive Mansion Fine Arts Committee – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The Executive Mansion Fine Arts Committee shall consist of 16 members appointed by the
Governor. The initial members of the Committee shall be the appointed members of the present
Executive Mansion Fine Arts Commission who shall serve for a period equal to the remainder of
their current terms on the Executive Mansion Fine Arts Commission, four of whose appointments
expire June 30, 1973, four of whose appointments expire June 30, 1974, four of whose
appointments expire June 30, 1975, and four of whose appointments expire June 30, 1976. At the
end of the respective terms of office of the initial members, the appointments of their successors
The terms of the members shall be for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed
and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Committee created by the resignation,
dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Committee from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Governor shall designate a member of the Committee to serve as chairman chair at his
the Governor's pleasure.
Members of the Committee shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Committee shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
All clerical and other services required by the Committee shall be supplied by the Secretary
of Natural and Cultural Resources."
SECTION 26. G.S. 143B-83 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-83. North Carolina Awards Committee – creation, powers powers, and duties.
There is hereby created the The North Carolina Awards Committee with the duty to of the
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is created. The Committee shall advise the
Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources the Department on the formulation and
administration of the program governing North Carolina awards and on the selection of a
committee in each award area to choose the recipients.
The Committee shall advise the Secretary of the Department upon any matter the Secretary
may refer refers to it."
SECTION 27. G.S. 143B-87 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-87. North Carolina Arts Council – creation, powers powers, and duties.
There is hereby created the North Carolina Arts Council with The North Carolina Arts
Council of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is created. The Council has the
following duties and functions:
(1) To advise the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources on the study,
collection, maintenance maintenance, and dissemination of factual data and
pertinent information relative to the arts;arts.
Page 10 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) To advise the Secretary concerning assistance to local organizations and the
community at large in the area of the arts;arts.
(3) To advise the Secretary on the exchange of information, promotion of
programs programs, and stimulation of joint endeavor between public and
nonpublic organizations;organizations.
(4) To identify research needs in the arts area and to encourage such research;this
research.
(5) To advise the Secretary in regard to bringing the highest obtainable quality in
the arts to the State and promoting the maximum opportunity for the people
to experience and enjoy those arts;arts.
(6) To advise the Secretary of the Department upon any matter the Secretary may
refer to it; andrefers to it.
(7) To advise the Secretary concerning the promotion of theater arts in the State."
SECTION 28. G.S. 143B-88 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-88. North Carolina Arts Council – members; selection; quorum; compensation.
The North Carolina Arts Council shall consist of 24 members appointed by the Governor.
The initial members of the Council shall be the appointed members of the present Arts Council
who shall serve for a period equal to the remainder of their current terms on the Arts Council,
eight of whose terms expire June 30, 1973, eight of whose terms expire June 30, 1974, and eight
of whose terms expire June 30, 1975. At the end of the respective terms of office of the initial
members, the appointments of their successors The terms of members shall be for terms of three
years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy
on the Council created by the resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for
the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Council from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Governor shall designate a member of the Council as chairman chair to serve at his the
Governor's pleasure.
Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Council shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
All clerical and other services required by the Council shall be supplied by the Secretary of
Natural and Cultural Resources."
SECTION 29. G.S. 143B-93 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-93. Roanoke Island Historical Association – status.
The Roanoke Island Historical Association is hereby declared not to be a State agency within
the meaning of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 and shall be not an agency, as defined
by G.S. 143B-3, and is exempt from all provisions of the Executive Organization Act of 1973
except G.S. 143B-92 and G.S. 143B-93.this Chapter except this Part."
SECTION 30. G.S. 143B-96 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-96. Edenton Historical Commission – status.
The Edenton Historical Commission is hereby declared not to be a State agency within the
meaning of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 and shall be not an agency, as defined by
G.S. 143B-3, and is exempt from all provisions of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 except
G.S. 143B-95 through G.S. 143B-98.this Chapter except this Part."
SECTION 31. G.S. 143B-100 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-100. Historic Bath Commission – status.
The Historic Bath Commission is hereby declared not to be a State agency within the meaning
of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 and shall be not an agency, as defined by G.S. 143B-3,
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and is exempt from all provisions of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 except
G.S. 143B-99 through G.S. 143B-102.this Chapter except this Part."
SECTION 32. G.S. 143B-104 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-104. Historic Hillsborough Commission – status.
The Historic Hillsborough Commission is hereby declared not to be a State agency within
the meaning of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 and shall be not an agency, as defined
by G.S. 143B-3, and is exempt from all provisions of the Executive Organization Act of 1973
except G.S. 143B-103 through G.S. 143B-106.this Chapter except this Part."
SECTION 33. G.S. 143B-108 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-108. Historic Murfreesboro Commission – status.
The Historic Murfreesboro Commission is hereby declared not to be a State agency within
the meaning of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 and shall be not an agency, as defined in
G.S. 143B-3, and is exempt from all provisions of the Executive Organization Act of 1973 except
G.S. 143B-107 through G.S. 143B-110.this Chapter except this Part."
SECTION 34. G.S. 143B-135.132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-135.132. North Carolina Trails Committee – members; selection; removal;
compensation.
The North Carolina Trails Committee shall consist of seven members appointed by the
Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources. Two members shall be from the mountain section,
two from the Piedmont section, two from the coastal plain, and one at large. They shall as much
as possible represent various trail users.
Committee members shall serve staggered terms of four years and until their successors are
appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Committee created by the
resignation, dismissal, death death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the
unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Committee from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources shall designate a member of the Committee
to serve as chairman chair at the pleasure of the Governor.
Members of the Committee shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5 and G.S. 143B-15 of the Executive
Organization Act of 1973.G.S. 138-5."
SECTION 35. G.S. 143B-135.207 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-135.207. North Carolina Zoological Park Council – members; selection; removal;
chairman; chair; compensation; quorum; services.
The North Carolina Zoological Park Council of the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources shall consist of 15 members appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be the
Chairman Chair of the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Zoological Society.
At the end of the respective terms of office of the initial members of the Council, the
Governor, to achieve staggered terms, shall appoint five members for terms of two years, five
members for terms of four years and five members for terms of six years. Thereafter, the
appointment of their successors The terms of members shall be for terms of six years and until
their successors are appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Council
created by the resignation, dismissal, death death, or disability of a member shall be for the
balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Council from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Governor shall designate a member of the Council to serve as chairman chair at his the
Governor's pleasure.
Page 12 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Council shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
All clerical and other services required by the Council shall be supplied by the Secretary of
Natural and Cultural Resources."
SECTION 36. G.S. 143B-147(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) All rules hereby adopted shall be consistent with the laws of this State and not
inconsistent with the management responsibilities of the Secretary of the Department of Health
and Human Services provided by this Chapter and the Executive Organization Act of
1973.Chapter."
SECTION 37. G.S. 143B-154 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-154. Social Services Commission – members; selection; quorum; compensation.
The Social Services Commission of the Department of Health and Human Services shall
consist of one member from each congressional district in the State, all of whom shall be
appointed by the Governor for four-year terms.
The initial members of the Commission shall be the appointed members of the current Social
Services Commission who shall serve for the remainder of their current terms and four additional
members appointed by the Governor for terms expiring April 1, 1981. Any An appointment to
fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death, removal removal,
or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
In the event that more than 11 If another congressional districts are district is established in
the State, the Governor shall shall, on July 1 following the establishment of such the additional
congressional districts district, appoint a member of the Commission from that congressional
district.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Commission from
office for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with the provisions of G.S.
143B-13 of the Executive Organization Act of 1973.G.S. 143B-13.
The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary
of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 38. G.S. 143B-158(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) A member of the Commission shall not vote on any issue before the Commission that
would have a significant and predictable effect on the member's financial interest. The Governor
shall have the power to may remove any member of the Commission from office for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-13 of the Executive
Organization Act of 1973.G.S. 143B-13."
SECTION 39. G.S. 143B-166 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-166. North Carolina Medical Care Commission – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The North Carolina Medical Care Commission of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall consist of 17 members appointed by the Governor. Three of the members
appointed by the Governor shall be nominated by the North Carolina Medical Society, one
member shall be nominated by the North Carolina Nurses Association, one member shall be
nominated by the North Carolina Pharmaceutical Association, Association of Pharmacists, one
member shall be nominated by the Duke Foundation Endowment, and one member shall be
nominated by the North Carolina Hospital Healthcare Association. The remaining 10 members
of the North Carolina Medical Care Commission shall be appointed by the Governor and selected
so as to fairly represent agriculture, industry, labor, and other interest groups in North Carolina.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
One such member appointed by the Governor shall be a dentist licensed to practice in North
Carolina Carolina, and one such member appointed by the Governor shall be an individual
affiliated with a nonprofit Continuing Care Retirement Community continuing care retirement
community licensed pursuant to Article 64 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes. The initial
members of the Commission shall be 18 members of the North Carolina Medical Care
Commission who shall serve for a period equal to the remainder of their current terms on the
North Carolina Medical Care Commission, six of whose appointments expire June 30, 1973, four
of whose appointments expire June 30, 1974, four of whose appointments expire June 30, 1975,
and four of whose appointments expire June 30, 1976. To achieve the required 17 members the
Governor shall appoint three members to the Commission upon the expiration of four members'
initial terms on June 30, 1973. At the end of the respective terms of office of the initial members
of the Commission, their successors The terms of the members shall be appointed for terms of
four years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a
vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a
member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Commission from
office for misfeasance, malfeasance malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with the
provisions of G.S. 143B-13 of the Executive Organization Act of 1973.G.S. 143B-13.
Vacancies on said the Commission among the membership nominated by a society,
association, or foundation as hereinabove provided shall be filled by the Executive Committee
executive committee or other authorized agent of said the society, association association, or
foundation until the next meeting of the society, association association, or foundation at which
time the society, association association, or foundation shall nominate a member to fill the
vacancy for the unexpired term.
The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary
of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 40. G.S. 143B-168.4 is recodified as G.S. 110-87.1 and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 110-87.1. Child Care Commission – members; selection; quorum.Commission.
(a) The Child Care Commission of the Department of Health and Human Services is
created. The Commission shall consist of 17 members. Nine of the members shall be appointed
by the Governor and eight by the General Assembly, four upon the recommendation of the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and four upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the
House of Representatives. Four of the members appointed by the Governor, two by the General
Assembly on the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and two by the
General Assembly on the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
Representatives shall be members of the public who are not employed in, or providing, child care
and who have no financial interest in a child care facility. Two of the foregoing public members
appointed by the Governor, one of the foregoing public members recommended by the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and one of the foregoing public members recommended by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be parents of children receiving child care services.
Of the remaining two public members appointed by the Governor, one shall be a pediatrician
currently licensed to practice in North Carolina. Three of the members appointed by the Governor
shall be child care providers, one of whom shall be affiliated with a for-profit child care center,
one of whom shall be affiliated with a for-profit family child care home, and one of whom shall
be affiliated with a nonprofit facility. Two of the members appointed by the Governor shall be
early childhood education specialists. Two of the members appointed by the General Assembly
Page 14 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
on the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Senate and two of the
members appointed by the General Assembly on recommendation of the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, Representatives shall be child care providers, one affiliated with a for-profit
child care facility, and one affiliated with a nonprofit child care facility. None of the members
may shall be employees of the State.
(b) Members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Of the Governor's initial appointees, five shall be appointed for terms expiring
June 30, 2020, and four shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30, 2021.
(2) Of the General Assembly's initial appointees appointed upon recommendation
of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, two shall be appointed for terms
expiring June 30, 2020, and two shall be appointed for terms expiring June
30, 2021.
(3) Of the General Assembly's initial appointees appointed upon recommendation
of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, two shall be appointed for
terms expiring June 30, 2020, and two shall be appointed for terms expiring
June 30, 2021.
Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with G.S. 120-121.
After the initial appointees' terms have expired, all All members shall be appointed to serve
two-year terms. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the
resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired
term.
(c) A vacancy occurring during a term of office is filled:filled as follows:
(1) By the Governor, if the Governor made the initial appointment;appointment.
(2) By the General Assembly, if the General Assembly made the initial
appointment in accordance with G.S. 120-122.
At its first meeting the Commission members shall elect a Chair to serve a term expiring June
30, 2020. A successor Chair shall be elected for a two-year terms thereafter. term on June 30 of
every even-numbered year. The same member may serve as Chair for two consecutive terms.
Commission members may be removed pursuant to G.S. 143B-13(d).
Commission members may be reappointed and may succeed themselves for a maximum of
four consecutive terms.
The Commission shall meet quarterly, and at other times at the call of the Chair or upon
written request of at least six members.
The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5. A majority of the Commission shall
constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary
of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 41. G.S. 143B-181 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-181. Governor's Advisory Council on Aging – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The Governor's Advisory Council on Aging of the Department of Health and Human Services
shall consist of 33 members, 29 members to be appointed by the Governor, two members to be
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and two members to be appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives. The composition of the Council shall be as follows:
one representative of the Department of Administration; one representative of the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources; one representative of the Division of Employment Security; one
representative of the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System; one representative of
the Commissioner of Labor; one representative of the Department of Public Instruction; one
representative of the Department of Environmental Quality; one representative of the Department
of Insurance; one representative of the Department of Public Safety; one representative of the
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Department of Community Colleges; Community Colleges System Office, one representative of
the School of Public Health of The University of North Carolina; one representative of the School
of Social Work of The University of North Carolina; one representative of the Agricultural
Extension Service of North Carolina State University; one representative of the collective body
of the Medical Society of North Carolina; and 19 members at large. The at large members shall
be citizens who are knowledgeable about services supported through the Older Americans Act
of 1965, as amended, and shall include persons with greatest economic or social need, minority
older persons, and participants in programs under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended.
The Governor shall appoint 15 members at large who meet these qualifications and are 60 years
of age or older. The four remaining members at large, two of whom shall be appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate and two of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, shall be broadly representative of the major private agencies and
organizations in the State who are experienced in or have demonstrated particular interest in the
special concerns of older persons. At least one of each of the at-large appointments of the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be
persons 60 years of age or older. The Council shall meet at least quarterly.
Members at large shall be appointed for four-year terms and until their successors are
appointed and qualify. Ad interim appointments shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Council from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Governor shall designate one member of the Council as chair to serve in such capacity
at his the Governor's pleasure.
Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Council shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
All clerical and other services required by the Council shall be supplied by the Secretary of
Health and Human Services."
SECTION 42. G.S. 143B-217 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-217. Department of Revenue – creation.
There is hereby recreated and reestablished a department to be known as the "Department of
Revenue" with the organization, duties, functions, and powers defined in the Executive
Organization Act of 1973.The Department of Revenue is created. The Department has the powers
and duties defined by law."
SECTION 43. G.S. 143B-293.2(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) Removal. – The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the
Commission from office for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with the
provisions of G.S. 143B-13 of the Executive Organization Act of 1973, nonfeasance, as provided
in G.S. 143B-13, or for good cause."
SECTION 44. G.S. 143B-324.2(c) and (d) read as rewritten:
"(c) Removal. – The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the
Council from office in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive
Organization Act of 1973.G.S. 143B-16.
(d) Compensation. – Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel
and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5 and G.S. 143B-15 of
the Executive Organization Act of 1973.G.S. 138-5."
SECTION 45. G.S. 143B-345 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-345. Department of Transportation – creation.
There is hereby created and established a department to be known as the "Department of
Transportation" with the organization, powers, and duties defined in Article 1 of Chapter 143B,
Page 16 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
except as modified in this Article.The Department of Transportation is created. The Department
has the powers and duties defined by law."
SECTION 46. G.S. 143B-348, as amended by Section 8 of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 143B-348. Department of Transportation – head; rules, regulations, etc., of Board of
Transportation.head.
(a) The Secretary of Transportation shall be is the head of the Department of
Transportation. He shall carry out The Secretary is responsible for the day-to-day operations of
the Department and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies, programs, priorities, and
projects approved by the Board of Transportation. He shall be The Secretary is responsible for
all other transportation matters assigned to the Department of Transportation, Department, except
those reserved to the Board of Transportation by statute. Except as otherwise provided for by
statute, the Secretary shall have all has the powers and duties as provided for in Article 1 of
Chapter 143B this Chapter, including the responsibility for all management functions for the
Department of Transportation. Department. The Secretary shall be vested with authority to may
adopt design criteria, construction specifications, and standards as required for the Department
of Transportation to construct and maintain highways, bridges, and ferries. The Secretary or the
Secretary's designee shall be vested with authority to promulgate may adopt rules and regulations
concerning all transportation functions assigned to the Department.
…."
SECTION 47. G.S. 143B-366 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-366. Department of Administration – creation.
There is hereby recreated and reestablished a department to be known as the "Department of
Administration," with the organization, powers, and duties defined in the Executive Organization
Act of 1973.The Department of Administration is created. The Department has the powers and
duties defined by law."
SECTION 48. G.S. 143B-394 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-394. North Carolina Council for Women – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The North Carolina Council for Women of the Department of Administration shall consist of
20 members appointed by the Governor. The initial members of the Council shall be the
appointed members of the North Carolina Council for Women, three of whose appointments
expire June 30, 1977, and four of whose appointments expire June 30, 1978. Thirteen additional
members shall be appointed in 1977, six of whom shall serve terms expiring June 30, 1978, and
seven of whom shall serve terms expiring June 30, 1979. At the ends of the respective terms of
office of the initial members of the Council and of the 13 members added in 1977, the
appointment of their successors The terms of the members shall be for terms of two years and
until their successors are appointed and qualify. Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the
Council created by the resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for the
balance of the unexpired term. Members of the Council shall be representative of age, sex, ethnic
ethnicity, and geographic backgrounds.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Council from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Governor shall designate a member of the Council to serve as chairman chair at the
pleasure of the Governor.
Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
A majority of the Council shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
All clerical and other services required by the Council shall be supplied by the Secretary of
Administration."
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 49. G.S. 143B-394.26 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-394.26. State Youth Advisory Council – members; selection; quorum;
compensation.
The State Youth Advisory Council of the Department of Administration shall consist of 20
members. The composition and appointment of the Council shall be as follows:
Ten youths to be elected by the procedure adopted by the Youth Advisory Council, which
shall include a requirement that four of the members represent youth organizations; and 10 adults
to be appointed by the Governor at least four of whom shall be individuals working on youth
programs through youth organizations. Provided that no No person shall serve on the Board for
more than two complete consecutive terms.
The initial members of the Council shall be the appointed members of the Youth Advisory
Board who shall serve for a period equal to the remainder of their current terms on the Youth
Advisory Board. The current terms of the youth members expire July 1, 1976, the current terms
of four of the adult members expire April 7, 1976, and the remaining four adult members' terms
expire May 1, 1978. At the end of the respective terms of office of the initial members of the
Council, the appointment of their successors shall be as follows:
(1) Eight youth members to serve for terms beginning on July 1, 1976, and
expiring on June 30, 1977, and two additional youth members to serve for
terms beginning on July 1, 1977, and expiring on June 30, 1978. At the end of
the terms of office of these youth members of the Council, the appointment of
their successors shall be for terms of two years and until their successors are
appointed and qualify.
(2) Four adult members to serve for terms beginning on April 8, 1976, and
expiring on June 30, 1979; four adult members to serve for terms beginning
on May 1, 1978, and expiring on June 30, 1980; one additional adult member
to serve for a term beginning July 1, 1977, and expiring June 30, 1978; and
one additional adult member to serve for a term beginning July 1, 1977, and
expiring June 30, 1979. At the end of the respective terms of office of these
adult members of the Council, the appointment of their successors The terms
of members shall be for terms of two years and until their successors are
appointed and qualify. At least one adult member shall be an advisor of a local
youth council at appointment and for the duration of the term. The total
membership shall reasonably reflect the socioeconomic, ethnic, sexual sexual,
and sectional composition of the State.
Any An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Council created by the resignation, dismissal,
death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor shall have the power to may remove any member of the Council from office
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 143B-16 of the Executive Organization Act of
1973.G.S. 143B-16.
The Governor shall designate an adult member of the Council to serve as chairman chair at
the pleasure of the Governor. The Council shall elect a youth member to serve as vice-chairman
vice-chair for a one-year term.
A majority of the Council shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
Members of the Council who are not officers or employees of the State shall receive per diem
and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with provisions of G.S. 138-5.
All clerical and other services required by the Council shall be supplied by the Secretary of
Administration."
SECTION 50. G.S. 143B-404 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-404. North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs – creation; name.
There is hereby created and established the The North Carolina State Commission of Indian
Affairs. The Commission shall be administered under the direction and supervision of Affairs is
Page 18 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administratively located in the Department of Administration pursuant to G.S. 143A-6(b) and
(c).but shall exercise its powers independently of the Secretary of Administration."
SECTION 51. G.S. 143B-431.01(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Contract. – The Department of Commerce is authorized to may contract with a North
Carolina nonprofit corporation to perform one or more of the Department's functions, powers,
duties, and obligations set forth in G.S. 143B-431, obligations, except as provided in this
subsection. The contract entered into pursuant to this section between the Department and the
Economic Development Partnership of North Carolina is exempt from Articles 3 and 3C of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and G.S. 143C-6-23. If the Department contracts with a
North Carolina nonprofit corporation to promote and grow the travel and tourism industries, then
all funds appropriated to the Department for tourism marketing purposes shall be used for a
research-based, comprehensive marketing program directed toward consumers in key markets
most likely to travel to North Carolina and not for ancillary activities, such as statewide branding
and business development marketing. The Department may shall not contract with a North
Carolina nonprofit corporation regarding any of the following:
(1) The obligation or commitment of funds under this Article, such as the One
North Carolina Fund, the Job Development Investment Grant Program, the
Industrial Development Fund, or the Job Maintenance and Capital
Development Fund.
(2) The Division of Employment Security, including the administration of
unemployment insurance.
(3) The functions set forth in G.S. 143B-431(a)(2).of an agency, board, or
commission that exercises its powers independently of the Secretary of
Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b).
(4) The administration of funds or grants received from the federal government
or its agencies, except for the following:
a. The State Trade and Export Promotion Program.
b. The Manufacturing Extension Program.
(5) The administration of a site certification program. Nothing in this subdivision
prohibits the contracting of responsibility for creating or maintaining a
website with data on unutilized or underutilized properties in the State with
potential commercial or industrial reuses."
SECTION 52. G.S. 143B-439(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The relationship between the Secretary of Commerce and the Credit Union
Commission shall be as defined for a Type II transfer under this Chapter.The Commission is
administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers
independently of the Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b)."
SECTION 53. The title of G.S. 143B-1203 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1203. Transfer; definitions.Definitions."
SECTION 54. G.S. 143B-1454(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The functions of the Division of Prisons shall include all functions of the executive
branch of the State in relation to corrections and the detention and rehabilitation of adult
offenders, including detention and further including those prescribed offenders and the powers,
duties, and functions enumerated in the laws of this State. All such functions, powers, duties, and
obligations heretofore vested in the State Department of Correction and Commission of
Correction are hereby transferred to and vested in the Division of Prisons of the Department of
Adult Correction except as otherwise provided by the Executive Organization Act of 1973."
SECTION 55. G.S. 143B-1490(a) and (c) read as rewritten:
"(a) There is hereby created a The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission of
the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction with
the authority to is created. The Commission has the following powers:
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) To grant paroles, including both regular and temporary paroles, to persons
held by virtue of any final order or judgment of any court of this State as
provided in Chapter 148 of the General Statutes and other laws of the State of
North Carolina, State, except that persons sentenced under Article 81B of
Chapter 15A of the General Statutes are not eligible for parole but may be
conditionally released into the custody and control of United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement pursuant to G.S. 148-64.1. The
Commission shall also have authority to
(2) To revoke, terminate, and suspend paroles of such persons (including persons
placed on parole on or before the effective date of the Executive Organization
Act of 1973) and to granted.
(3) To assist the Governor in exercising his the Governor's authority in granting
reprieves, commutations, and pardons, pardons and shall perform such to
perform other services as may be required by the Governor may require in
exercising his the powers of executive clemency. The Commission shall also
have authority to
(4) To revoke and terminate persons on post-release supervision, as provided in
Article 84A of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes. The Commission shall
also have the authority to
(5) To punish for criminal contempt for the willful refusal to accept post-release
supervision or to comply with the terms of post-release supervision by a
prisoner whose offense requiring post-release supervision is a reportable
conviction subject to the registration requirement of Article 27A of Chapter
14 of the General Statutes. Any A contempt proceeding conducted by the
Commission shall be in accordance with G.S. 5A-15 as if the Commission
were a judicial official.
…
(c) The Commission is authorized and empowered to may adopt rules not inconsistent
with the laws of this State, in accordance with by which prisoners eligible for parole consideration
may have their cases reviewed and investigated and by which such parole proceedings may be
initiated and considered. All rules and regulations heretofore adopted by the Board of Paroles
shall remain in full force and effect unless and until repealed or superseded by action of the
Commission. All rules adopted by the Commission shall be enforced by the Division of
Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction."
SECTION 56. G.S. 143B-1491 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1491. Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission – members; selection;
removal; chair; compensation; quorum; services.
(a) Effective August 1, 2005, the The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission
shall consist of one four full-time member and two half-time members. The three members shall
be appointed by the Governor from persons whose recognized ability, training, experience, and
character qualify them for service on the Commission. The terms of office of any members
serving on the Commission on June 30, 2005, shall expire on that date. members appointed by
the Governor. The terms of office of persons appointed by the Governor as members of the
Commission shall be for four years or until their successors are appointed and qualify. Any An
appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, removal, death
death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term only.
(a1) Effective August 1, 2012, both half-time commissioners shall begin serving as
full-time members of the Commission, and the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission
shall consist of three full-time members.
Page 20 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a2) Effective February 1, 2013, an additional member shall be appointed by the Governor
to the Commission, and the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall consist of
four full-time members.
(b) All members of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission appointed by
the Governor shall possess the recognized ability, training, experience, and character to qualify
each person to serve ably on the Commission.
(c) The Governor shall have the authority to may remove any member of the Commission
from office for misfeasance, malfeasance malfeasance, or nonfeasance, pursuant to the
provisions of G.S. 143B-13. The Governor shall designate a member of the Commission to serve
as chair of the Commission at the pleasure of the Governor.
(d) The granting, denying, revoking, or rescinding of parole, the authorization of
work-release privileges to a prisoner, or any other matters of business coming before the
Commission for consideration and action shall be decided by majority vote of the full
Commission, except that a three-member panel of the Commission may set the terms and
conditions for a post-release supervisee under G.S. 15A-1368.4 and may decide questions of
violations thereunder, of these terms and conditions, including the issuance of warrants. In the
event of a tie in a vote by the full Commission, the chair shall break the tie with an additional
vote.
(e) The members of the Commission shall receive the salary fixed by the General
Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act and shall receive necessary travel and
subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-6. The half-time members of
the Commission shall not be subject to the provisions of G.S. 135-3(a)(8)c.
(f) All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the
Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction."

PART III. REPEAL OTHER PROVISIONS CONCERNING THE OBSOLETE 1971 AND
1973 REORGANIZATIONS OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH AND MAKE
CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 57. G.S. 18B-500(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Appointment. – The Secretary of Public Safety shall appoint and supervise the
Director of the Division of Alcohol Law Enforcement of the Department of Public Safety. The
Director of the Division of Alcohol Law Enforcement of the Department of Public Safety may
appoint and supervise a sufficient number of assistants who shall be competent and qualified to
do the work of the Division. The Director is responsible for making all hiring and personnel
decisions of the Division. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter or Chapter 143A of the
General Statutes, Chapter, the Director may hire or fire personnel and transfer personnel within
the Division. The Director may also appoint a regular employee of the Commission as an ALE
agent, provided so long as the employee was employed by the ABC Commission and serving as
an ALE agent on January 1, 2019. Alcohol law-enforcement agents shall be designated as
"alcohol law-enforcement agents." Persons serving as reserve alcohol law-enforcement agents
are considered employees of the Division for workers' compensation purposes while performing
duties assigned or approved by the Director of the Division or the Director's designee."
SECTION 58. G.S. 53C-2-1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The State Banking Commission is created. The Commission is administratively
located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers independently of the
Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b). The Commission consists of 15 members,
including the State Treasurer, who shall serve as an ex officio member; 12 members appointed
by the Governor; and two members appointed by the General Assembly under G.S. 120-121, one
of whom shall be appointed upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
and one of whom shall be appointed upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives. The Governor shall appoint to the Commission three practical bankers, one
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
consumer finance licensee, one member who is, or is employed by a person that is, licensed under
Article 19B of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes, and seven public members. The member
appointed upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be a
practical banker, and the member appointed upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the
House shall be a practical banker. Members shall serve terms of four years. No individual shall
serve more than two complete consecutive terms on the Commission. Any vacancy occurring in
the membership of the Commission shall be filled by the appropriate appointing officer for the
unexpired term, except that vacancies among members appointed by the General Assembly shall
be filled in accordance with G.S. 120-122. The appointed members of the Commission shall
receive subsistence and travel expenses at the rates set forth in G.S. 120-3.1. This compensation
shall be paid from the revenues of the OCOB."
SECTION 59. G.S. 53C-2-3(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The Commissioner shall be assisted in the performance of the duties of office by (i)
one or more deputy commissioners and (ii) examiners, investigators, counsel, and other
employees under the supervision of the Commissioner, all of whom, together with the
Commissioner, shall comprise the "Office of the Commissioner of Banks." The OCOB is
administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers
independently of the Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b). In addition, the work of
the OCOB may be conducted by employees of other agencies of government and by agents and
independent contractors of the OCOB. The Commissioner may appoint or remove at his or her
discretion any deputy commissioner."
SECTION 60. Article 1 of Chapter 54B of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 54B-4.1. Savings Institution Division.
The Savings Institution Division is created. The Division is administratively located in the
Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers independently of the Secretary of
Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b)."
SECTION 61. G.S. 62-10(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The North Carolina Utilities Commission is created. The Commission is
administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers
independently of the Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b). The Commission shall
consist of five commissioners who shall be appointed as follows: two by the Governor, one by
the State Treasurer, one by the General Assembly, upon the recommendation of the Speaker of
the House of Representatives in accordance with G.S. 120-121, and one by the General
Assembly, upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance
with G.S. 120-121. Each commissioner shall serve for a term of six years commencing on July 1
of the year in which the predecessor term expired and ending on June 30 of the sixth year
thereafter. Commissioners appointed by the Governor and Treasurer are subject to confirmation
by the General Assembly by joint resolution. The names of commissioners to be appointed by
the Governor and Treasurer shall be submitted by the Governor and Treasurer to the General
Assembly for confirmation by the General Assembly on or before May 1, of the year in which
the terms for which the appointments are to be made are to expire. Upon failure of the Governor
or Treasurer to submit names as herein provided, provided in this subsection, the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives jointly shall submit the
names of a like number of commissioners to the General Assembly on or before May 15 of the
same year for confirmation by the General Assembly. Regardless of the way in which names of
commissioners are submitted, confirmation of commissioners must be accomplished prior to
adjournment of the then current session of the General Assembly."
SECTION 62. G.S. 76A-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 76A-1. Commission established; powers generally.
Page 22 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
In consideration of the requirement for the safe and expeditious movement of waterborne
commerce on the navigable waters of the State, it is deemed necessary to establish the Cape Fear
Navigation and Pilotage Commission, hereinafter referred to as the Commission. The
Commission is administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its
powers independently of the Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b). The Commission
shall have has the exclusive power to license and regulate a group of river pilots familiar with
the waters of the Cape Fear River and Bar to best guide vessels within those waters and to
exercise authority over navigation in the Cape Fear and Bar and to and from the sea buoy of the
port. The Commission shall report its activities to the Governor through the Secretary of
Commerce."
SECTION 63. G.S. 76A-31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 76A-31. Morehead City Navigation and Pilotage Commission.
In consideration of the requirement for the safe and expeditious movement of waterborne
commerce on the navigable waters of the State, it is deemed necessary to establish the Morehead
City Navigation and Pilotage Commission, herein called Commission. The Commission is
administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers
independently of the Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b). The Commission shall
have has the exclusive power to license and regulate pilots familiar with the waters of Morehead
City Harbor and Beaufort Bar and the water route from Morehead City to Aurora, North Carolina
(to include Carolina, including from Morehead City through the Inland or Intracoastal Waterway
North, through Adams Creek, the Neuse River, the Bay River, the Hobuken Canal, the Pamlico
River, and South Creek to Aurora or from the Neuse River around Brant Island Shoal through
the Pamlico River and South Creek to Aurora), Aurora, referred to herein in this Subchapter as
the regulated area, to best guide vessels within those waters and to exercise authority over
navigation in Morehead City Harbor and Beaufort Bar and to and from the sea buoy of the port.
The Commission shall report its activities to the Governor through the Secretary of Commerce."
SECTION 64. G.S. 97-77 reads as rewritten:
"§ 97-77. North Carolina Industrial Commission created; members appointed by
Governor; terms of office; chairman.chair.
…
(b) One member, to be designated by the Governor, shall act as chairman.chair.
The chairman chair shall be the chief judicial officer and the chief executive officer of the
Industrial Commission; such this authority shall be exercised pursuant to the provisions of
Chapter 126 of the General Statutes and the rules and policies of the State Human Resources
Commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter, the chairman shall have such chair
has authority as is necessary to direct and oversee the Commission. The chairman chair may
delegate any duties and responsibilities as may be necessary to ensure the proper management of
the Industrial Commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter, Chapter 143A,
Chapter and Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, the chairman chair may hire or fire personnel
and transfer personnel within the Industrial Commission.
The Governor may designate one vice-chairman vice-chair from the remaining
commissioners."
SECTION 65. G.S. 113-128(10) reads as rewritten:
"(10) Wildlife Resources Commission. – The North Carolina Wildlife Resources
Commission as established by Article 24 of Chapter 143 of the General
Statutes and Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes.Statutes."
SECTION 66. G.S. 117-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 117-1. Rural Electrification Authority created; appointments; terms of members.
An agency to be known as the The North Carolina Rural Electrification Authority is hereby
created as an agency of the State of North Carolina, such agency to created. The Authority is
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administratively located in the Department of Commerce but shall exercise its powers
independently of the Secretary of Commerce under G.S. 143C-1-6(b). It shall consist of five
members to be appointed by the Governor of North Carolina. Current members of the North
Carolina Rural Electrification Authority shall complete their respective terms of office. On or
after June 5, 1975, the Governor shall appoint two members to replace those members whose
terms expire on said date. Governor. All appointments made by the Governor shall be made for
terms of four years."
SECTION 67. G.S. 126-3(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) There is hereby established the The Office of State Human Resources (hereinafter
referred to as "the Office") which shall be placed is created. The Office is located for
organizational purposes within the Office of the Governor. Notwithstanding the provisions of
North Carolina State government reorganization as of January 1, 1975, and specifically
notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 864 of the 1971 North Carolina Session Laws, Chapter
143A of the General Statutes, the The Office of State Human Resources shall exercise all of its
statutory powers in this Chapter, which shall be is under the administration and supervision of a
Director of the Office of State Human Resources (hereinafter referred to as "the Director")
appointed by the Governor and subject to the supervision of the Commission for purposes of this
Chapter. The salary of the Director shall be fixed set by the Governor. The Director shall serve
at the pleasure of the Governor."
SECTION 68. G.S. 126-19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 126-19. Equal employment opportunity plans; reports; maintenance of services by
Director of the Office of State Human Resources.
(a) Each member of the Council of State under G.S. 143A-11, each of the principal
departments principal State office or principal State department enumerated in G.S. 143B-6, The
University of North Carolina, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch, branch shall develop
and submit on an annual basis an Equal Employment Opportunity plan which that shall include
goals and programs that provide positive measures to assure equitable and fair representation of
North Carolina's citizens. The plans developed by the judicial branch and by the Legislative
Services Office on behalf of the legislative branch shall be submitted to the General Assembly
on or before June 1 of each year. All other such plans shall be submitted to the Director of the
Office of State Human Resources for review and approval on or before March 1, 1 of each year.
(b) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-382, s. 7.3, effective August 21, 2013.
(c) The Director of the Office of State Human Resources will shall provide services of
Equal Employment Opportunity technical assistance, training, oversight, monitoring, evaluation,
support programs, and reporting to assure that the State government's work force is diverse at all
occupational levels. These services shall be provided by qualified personnel."
SECTION 69. G.S. 136-18 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(12c) To contract with the United States government to obtain the benefits available
to the State under the Federal Highway Safety Act of 1966 and, with the
Governor's approval, to coordinate the activities of all departments and
agencies of the State and its subdivisions to obtain these benefits."
SECTION 70. G.S. 140-5.13(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Any member of the Board of Trustees may be removed from office by the authority
that appointed or elected that member for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in office. In
the case of an appointment made by the Governor, removal shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of G.S. 143B-13 of the Executive Organization Act of 1973."
SECTION 71. The following statutes in Chapter 143 of the General Statutes are
repealed:
(1) G.S. 143-34.11. The provisions repealed by this statute are not reenacted.
(2) G.S. 143-50.
(3) G.S. 143-247.
Page 24 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) G.S. 143-248.
(5) G.S. 143-249.
(6) G.S. 143-326.
(7) G.S. 143-344.
(8) G.S. 143-345.
SECTION 72. G.S. 143-240(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) There is hereby created the The Wildlife Resources Commission of the Department
of Environmental Quality which is created. The Commission is administratively located in the
Department of Environmental Quality but shall exercise its powers independently of the
Secretary of Environmental Quality. The Commission is subject to the direction and supervision
of the Secretary only with respect to the management functions of coordinating and reporting.
The Commission shall consist of 19 citizens of North Carolina who shall be appointed as is
provided in G.S. 143-241. Each
Each member of the Commission shall be an experienced hunter, fisherman, farmer, or
biologist, who shall be generally informed on wildlife conservation and restoration problems.
Members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5 or G.S. 138-6 as the case may be, which
shall be paid from fees collected by the Wildlife Resources Commission."
SECTION 73.(a) Subdivision (1) of G.S. 143-745(a) is recodified as subdivision (3)
of that subsection.
SECTION 73.(b) G.S. 143-745(a), as amended by subsection (a) of this section,
reads as rewritten:
"(a) For the purposes of this section:The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Recodified.
(2) "State agency" means each department created pursuant to Chapter 143A or
143B of the General Statutes, and State agency. – A principal State office or
principal State department listed in G.S. 143B-6. The term includes all
institutions, boards, commissions, or authorities, by whatever name, that is a
unit are units of the executive branch of State government, including The
University of North Carolina, Carolina and the Community Colleges System
Office. The term does not include a unit of local government.
(3) "Agency head" means the State agency head. – The Governor, a Council of
State member, a cabinet secretary, the President of The University of North
Carolina, the President of the Community College System, the State
Controller, and other independent appointed officers with authority over a
State agency."
SECTION 73.(c) G.S. 143-746 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-746. Internal auditing required.
(a) Requirements. – A State agency shall establish a program of internal auditing that:that
does all of the following:
(1) Promotes an effective system of internal controls that safeguards public funds
and assets and minimizes incidences of fraud, waste, and abuse.
(2) Determines if programs and business operations are administered in
compliance with federal and state laws, regulations, State laws and other
requirements.
(3) Reviews the effectiveness and efficiency of agency and program operations
and service delivery.
(4) Periodically audits the agency's major systems and controls,
including:including the following:
a. Accounting systems and controls.
b. Administrative systems and controls.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Information technology systems and controls.
(a1) Key Performance Indicators and Criteria. – In addition to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section, each State agency head shall be is responsible for ensuring that the
State agency's internal audit unit meets the required key indicators and criteria established by the
Council under G.S. 143-747(c)(3a).
(b) Internal Audit Standards. – Internal audits shall comply with current Standards for the
Professional Practice of Internal Auditing issued by the Institute for Internal Auditors or, if
appropriate, Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United
States. Each State agency head shall annually certify to the Council that the audit plan was
developed and the audit reports were conducted and reported in accordance with required
standards.
(c) Appointment and Qualifications of Internal Auditors. – Any A State employee who
performs the internal audit function shall meet the minimum qualifications for internal auditors
established by the Office of State Human Resources, in consultation with the Council of Internal
Auditing.
(d) Director of Internal Auditing. – The A State agency head shall appoint a Director of
Internal Auditing who shall report to, as designated by the State agency head, (i) the State agency
head, (ii) the chief deputy or chief of staff, or (iii) the agency governing board, or subcommittee
thereof, if such a this governing board exists. The Director of Internal Auditing shall be
organizationally situated to avoid impairments to independence as defined in the auditing
standards referenced in subsection (b) of this section.
(e) Insufficient Personnel. – If a State agency has insufficient personnel to comply with
this section, the Office of State Budget and Management shall provide technical assistance.
(f) Reporting Fraudulent Activity. – If an internal audit conducted pursuant to this section
results in a finding that a private person or entity has received public funds as a result of fraud,
misrepresentation, or other deceptive acts or practices while doing business with the State
agency, the internal auditor shall submit a detailed written report of the finding, and any
additional necessary supporting documentation, to the State Purchasing Officer. A report
submitted under this subsection may include a recommendation that the private person or entity
be debarred from doing business with the State or a political subdivision thereof."
SECTION 74. G.S. 147-12(a)(10) is repealed.
SECTION 75. G.S. 147-13.1 is repealed.
SECTION 76. G.S. 147-34 is repealed.
SECTION 77. G.S. 150B-2(8a) reads as rewritten:
"(8a) Rule. – Any agency regulation, standard, or statement of general applicability
that implements or interprets an enactment of the General Assembly or
Congress or a regulation adopted by a federal agency or that describes the
procedure or practice requirements of an agency. The term includes the
establishment of a fee and the amendment or repeal of a prior rule. The term
does not include the following:
a. Statements concerning only the internal management of an agency or
group of agencies within the same principal office or department
enumerated in G.S. 143A-11 or 143B-6, G.S. 143B-6, including
policies and procedures manuals, if the statement does not directly or
substantially affect the procedural or substantive rights or duties of a
person not employed by the agency or group of agencies.
b. Budgets and budget policies and procedures issued by the Director of
the Budget, by the head of a department, as defined by G.S. 143A-2 or
G.S. 143B-3, or by an occupational licensing board, as defined by
G.S. 93B-1.
Page 26 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Nonbinding interpretative statements within the delegated authority of
an agency that merely define, interpret, or explain the meaning of a
statute or rule.
d. A form, the contents or substantive requirements of which are
prescribed by rule or statute.
e. Statements of agency policy made in the context of another
proceeding, including:including the following:
1. Declaratory rulings under G.S. 150B-4.
2. Orders establishing or fixing rates or tariffs.
…
k. The State Medical Facilities Plan, if the Plan has been prepared with
public notice and hearing as provided in G.S. 131E-176(25),
G.S. 131E-176.2, reviewed by the Commission for compliance with
G.S. 131E-176(25), G.S. 131E-176.2, and approved by the Governor.
l. Standards adopted by the State Chief Information Officer and applied
to information technology as defined in G.S. 143B-1320.
m. Determinations by the Department of Environmental Quality of high
hazards pursuant to G.S. 130A-330."
SECTION 78. G.S. 159D-38(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) The North Carolina Capital Facilities Finance Agency shall be contained within is
administratively located in the Department of State Treasurer as if it had been transferred to that
department by a Type II transfer as defined in G.S. 143A-6(b).but shall exercise its powers
independently of the State Treasurer."

PART IV. OTHER TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
SECTION 79. The Revisor of Statutes shall renumber definitions in G.S. 20-4.01 so
that they appear in alphabetical order.
SECTION 80. G.S. 20-16(a)(8) is repealed.
SECTION 81. G.S. 30-48 reads as rewritten:
"§ 30-48. Right of surviving community-property spouse.
(a) The surviving community-property spouse of a decedent may assert a claim for relief
with respect to a right under this Article in accordance with the following:
…
(3) The incapacity of the surviving community-property spouse does not toll the
time for commencing an action or filing a petition as provided in this section.
…."
SECTION 82. G.S. 58-19-26 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-19-26. Group capital calculation.
(a) Reporting Requirement. – The ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to
registration pursuant to G.S. 58-19-25 shall concurrently file with the registration an annual
group capital calculation report. The report shall be filed with the lead state commissioner.
(b) Exemptions. – The ultimate controlling person of any of the following is exempt from
the filing requirement of subsection (a) of this section:
(1) An insurance holding company system that (i) has only one insurer within its
holding company structure, (ii) only writes insurance business, (iii) is only
licensed in its state of domicile, and (iv) assumes no business from any other
insurer.structure and whose sole insurer meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is licensed only in its state of domicile.
b. Writes only insurance business and only in its state of domicile.
c. Assumes no business from any other insurer.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 27

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(c) Recognition of Group Capital Calculation. – For purposes of subdivision (b)(4) of
this section, a non-United States jurisdiction recognizes the group capital calculation if it satisfies
any of the following criteria:
(1) A competent regulatory authority in the jurisdiction affirms that insurers and
insurance groups whose lead state is accredited by the NAIC under the NAIC
accreditation program shall be are subject only to worldwide prudential
insurance group supervision, including worldwide group governance,
solvency and capital, and reporting, as applicable, by that jurisdiction's lead
state commissioner and will not be are not subject to group supervision,
including worldwide group governance, solvency and capital, and reporting,
at the level of the worldwide parent undertaking of the insurance or
reinsurance group by the non-United States jurisdiction.
(2) A competent regulatory authority in the jurisdiction affirms that information
regarding insurers and their parent, subsidiary, or affiliated entities, if
applicable, shall be provided to the lead state commissioner in accordance
with an information sharing agreement in the form of a memorandum of
understanding or similar document. Acceptable information sharing
agreements include the International Association of Insurance Supervisors
Multilateral Memorandum of Understanding or other multilateral memoranda
of understanding coordinated by the NAIC. The jurisdiction does not satisfy
this these criteria if the lead state commissioner determines, in consultation
with the NAIC, that the requirements of the information sharing agreements
are no longer in force.
…."
SECTION 83.(a) G.S. 58-33-46 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-46. Suspension, probation, revocation, or nonrenewal of licenses.
(a) The Commissioner may place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any
license issued under this Article, in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and Article
3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, for any one or more of the following causes:
(1) Providing materially incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue
information in the license application.
(2) Violating any insurance law of this or any other state, violating any
administrative rule, subpoena, or order of the Commissioner or of another
state's insurance regulator, or violating any rule of the FINRA.
…
(6) Having been convicted of a any felony or of a misdemeanor involving
dishonesty, a breach of trust, or moral turpitude.dishonesty or a breach of trust.
(7) Having admitted or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade
practice or fraud.
(8) Using fraudulent, coercive, or dishonest practices, or demonstrating
incompetence, untrustworthiness, or financial irresponsibility irresponsibility,
in the conduct of business in this State or elsewhere.
…
(12a) Soliciting, negotiating, or selling insurance in this State for an unauthorized
insurer, regardless of whether the licensee or applicant knew that the insurer
was unauthorized. As used in this section, the terms "soliciting",
"negotiating", and "selling" shall have the meaning of "solicit", "negotiate",
and "sell", respectively, set forth in G.S. 58-33-10.
…
Page 28 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(15) Cheating on an examination for an insurance license or for a prelicensing or
continuing education course, including improperly using notes or any other
reference material to complete an examination for an insurance license or for
a prelicensing or continuing education course.
…
(b) G.S. 58-2-50 applies to any an investigation under this section. G.S. 58-2-70 applies
to any a person subject to licensure under this Article.
(c) Any A person licensed under this Article shall notify the Commissioner of the
commencement of any bankruptcy, insolvency, or receivership proceeding affecting the person
licensed, or upon making an assignment for the benefit of creditors of the person licensed. Each
owner, manager, or officer of a business entity that is a licensed person shall be is responsible
for providing this notification. Any A person responsible for notifying the Commissioner shall
provide the notice within three business days after the commencement of the proceeding or the
making of the assignment.
…
(e) No person shall be issued a license or appointment to enter the employment of any
other person, which if the other person is at that time found by the Commissioner to be in
violation of any of the insurance laws of this State, or which if the other person has been in any
manner disqualified under any state or federal law to engage in the insurance business.
(f) The Commissioner shall retain retains the authority to enforce the provisions of, and
impose any penalty or remedy authorized by, this Chapter against any person who that is under
investigation for or charged with a violation of this Chapter even if the person's license or
registration has been surrendered or has lapsed by operation of law."
SECTION 83.(b) G.S. 58-33-125 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-125. Fees.
(a) The following table indicates the annual fees that are required for the respective
licenses issued, renewed, or cancelled under this Article and Article 21 of this Chapter:
Adjuster ................................................................................................. $75.00
Adjuster, crop hail only ........................................................................... 20.00
Insurance producer cancellation (paid by insurer) .................................. 10.00
Insurance producer appointment, individual ........................................... 11.00
Insurance producer appointment, Medicare
supplement and long-term care, individual ............................... 10.00
Agent, overseas military.......................................................................... 20.00
Business entity ...................................................................................... 100.00
Limited representative ............................................................................. 20.00
Limited representative cancellation (paid by insurer) ............................. 10.00
Motor vehicle damage appraiser ............................................................. 75.00
Surplus lines licensee, corporate ........................................................... 100.00
Surplus lines licensee, individual ............................................................ 50.00
(b) Whenever a temporary license is issued under this Article, the fee shall be at the same
rate as provided in subsection (a) of this section; and any amounts so paid for a temporary license
may be credited against the fee required for an appointment by the sponsoring company.section.
(c) Any A person who that is not licensed and who that is required by law or
administrative rule to secure a license shall, upon application for licensing, pay to the
Commissioner a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). If additional licensing for other lines of authority is
requested, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be paid to the Commissioner upon application for
licensing for each additional kind of insurance.
In addition to the fees prescribed by this subsection, any a person applying for a supplemental
license to sell Medicare supplement and long-term care insurance policies shall pay an additional
fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) upon application for licensing for that line of authority.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 29

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) The requirement for an examination, prelicensing education, continuing education, or
a registration fee does not apply to agents for domestic farmers' mutual assessment fire insurance
companies or associations who that solicit and sell only those kinds of insurance specified in
G.S. 58-7-75(5)d. for those companies or associations.
…
(h) Fees paid by an insurer on behalf of a person who that is licensed or appointed to
represent the insurer are payable to the Commissioner when billed. Billing of insurers for renewal
fees must be on an annual basis. The frequency for billing insurers for other licensing and
appointment fees is determined by the Commissioner and may be daily, monthly, or quarterly.
An electronic payment made through the NAIC or an affiliate of NAIC is considered a payment
to the Commissioner."
SECTION 83.(c) G.S. 58-33-132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-132. Qualifications of instructors.
(a) The Commissioner may adopt rules to establish requisite qualifications for and
issuance, renewal, summary suspension, and termination of provider, presenter, and instructor
authority for prelicensing and continuing insurance education courses. During any suspension,
the instructor shall not engage in any instruction of prelicensing or continuing insurance
education courses prior to an administrative review. No person shall provide, present, or instruct
any course unless that person has been qualified by and possesses a license from the
Commissioner or administrator.
(b) The Commissioner or administrator may summarily suspend or terminate the
authority of an instructor, course provider, or presenter if either of the following applies to the
course presentation:
(1) Is It is determined to be inaccurate; orinaccurate.
(2) Receives It receives an evaluation of poor from any Department monitor and
a majority of attendees responding to Department questionnaires about the
presentation."
SECTION 83.1.(a) G.S. 90-85.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-85.3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1)(a) "Administer" means the Administer. – The direct application of a drug to the
body of a patient by injection, inhalation, ingestion ingestion, or other means.
(2)(b) "Board" means the Board. – The North Carolina Board of Pharmacy.
(3)(b1) "Certified pharmacy technician" means a Certified pharmacy technician. – A
pharmacy technician who (i) has passed a nationally recognized pharmacy
technician certification board examination, or its equivalent, that has been
approved by the Board and (ii) obtains and maintains certification from a
nationally recognized pharmacy technician certification board that has been
approved by the Board.
(4)(b2) "CLIA-waived test" means a CLIA-waived test. – A laboratory test authorized
by the United States Food and Drug Administration and waived under the
Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988.
(5)(b3) "Clinical pharmacist practitioner" means a Clinical pharmacist practitioner. –
A licensed pharmacist who meets the guidelines and criteria for such title that
title, as established by the joint subcommittee of the North Carolina Medical
Board and the North Carolina Board of Pharmacy Pharmacy, and who is
authorized to perform medical acts, tasks, and functions for drug therapy,
disease, or population health management agreements with physicians in
accordance with the provisions of G.S. 90-18.4.
Page 30 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6)(c) "Compounding" means taking Compounding. – Taking two or more
ingredients and combining them into a dosage form of a drug, exclusive of
compounding by a drug manufacturer, distributor, or packer.
(7)(d) "Deliver" means the Deliver. – The actual, constructive constructive, or
attempted transfer of a drug, a device, or medical equipment from one person
to another.
(8)(e) "Device" means an Device. – An instrument, apparatus, implement, machine,
contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent reagent, or other similar or related article
article, including any component part or accessory, whose label or labeling
bears the statement "Caution: federal law requires dispensing by or on the
order of a physician." The term does not include:
a.(1) Devices used in the normal course of treating patients by health care
facilities and agencies licensed under Chapter 131E or Article 2 of
Chapter 122C of the General Statutes;Statutes.
b.(2) Devices used or provided in the treatment of patients by medical
doctors, dentists, physical therapists, occupational therapists, speech
pathologists, optometrists, chiropractors, podiatrists, and nurses
licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, provided so long as
they do not dispense devices used to administer or dispense drugs.
(9)(f) "Dispense" means preparing Dispense. – Preparing and packaging a
prescription drug or device in a container and labeling the container with
information required by State and federal law. Filling The term includes filling
or refilling drug containers with prescription drugs for subsequent use by a
patient is "dispensing". Providing patient. The term also includes providing
quantities of unit dose prescription drugs for subsequent administration is
"dispensing".administration.
(10)(g) "Drug" means:Drug. – An article that meets any of the following descriptions:
a.(1) Any article recognized Is recognized as a drug in the United States
Pharmacopeia, or in any other drug compendium or any supplement
thereto, to it, or an article recognized as a drug by the United States
Food and Drug Administration; Administration.
b.(2) Any article, other Other than food or devices, is intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment treatment, or prevention of
disease in man or other animals; animals.
c.(3) Any article, other Other than food or devices, is intended to affect the
structure or any function of the body of man or other animals;
andanimals.
d.(4) Any article intended Is intended for use as a component of any articles
an article specified in clause (1), (2) or (3) of this
subsection.sub-subdivisions a., b., or c. of this subdivision.
(11)(h) "Emancipated minor" means any person Emancipated minor. – An individual
under the age of 18 who is or has been married or married, who is or has been
a parent; or whose parents or guardians have surrendered their rights to the
minor's services and earnings as well as their right to custody and control of
the minor's person; parent, or who has been emancipated by an appropriate a
court order.
(12)(i) "Health care provider" means any Health care provider. – A licensed health
care professional; any an agent or employee of any a health care institution,
health care insurer, or health care professional school; or a member of any an
allied health profession.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 31

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(13)(i1)"Immunizing pharmacist" means a Immunizing pharmacist. – A licensed
pharmacist who meets all of the following qualifications:
a.(1) Holds a current provider level cardiopulmonary resuscitation
certification issued by the American Heart Association or the
American Red Cross, or an equivalent certification.
b.(2) Has successfully completed a certificate program in vaccine
administration accredited by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention, the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education, or a
similar health authority or professional body approved by the Board.
c.(3) Maintains documentation of three hours of continuing education every
two years, designed to maintain competency in the disease states,
drugs, and vaccine administration.
d.(4) Has successfully completed training approved by the Division of
Public Health's Immunization Branch for participation in the North
Carolina Immunization Registry.
e.(5) Has notified the North Carolina Board of Pharmacy and the North
Carolina Medical Board of immunizing pharmacist status.
f.(6) Administers vaccines, long-acting injectable medications, or
immunizations in accordance with G.S. 90-18.15B. G.S. 90-85.15B.
(14)(j) "Label" means a Label. – A display of written, printed printed, or graphic
matter upon on the immediate or outside container of any a drug.
(15)(k) "Labeling" means preparing Labeling. – Preparing and affixing a label to any
a drug container, exclusive of labeling by a manufacturer, packer packer, or
distributor of a nonprescription drug or a commercially packaged prescription
drug or device.
(16)(l) "License" means a License. – A license to practice pharmacy including a
renewal license issued by the Board.
(17)(l1)"Medical equipment" means any Medical equipment. – Any of the following
items that are intended for use by the consumer in the consumer's place of
residence:
a.(1) A device.
b.(2) Ambulation assistance equipment.
c.(3) Mobility equipment.
d.(4) Rehabilitation seating.
e.(5) Oxygen and respiratory care equipment.
f.(6) Rehabilitation environmental control equipment.
g.(7) Diagnostic equipment.
h.(8) A bed prescribed by a physician to treat or alleviate a medical
condition.
The term "medical equipment" does not include (i) medical equipment used
or dispensed in the normal course of treating patients by or on behalf of home care
agencies, hospitals, and nursing facilities licensed under Chapter 131E of the
General Statutes or hospitals or agencies licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 122C
of the General Statutes; (ii) medical equipment used or dispensed by professionals
licensed under Chapters 90 or Chapter 93D of the General Statutes, provided so
long as the professional is practicing within the scope of that professional's
practice act; (iii) upper and lower extremity prosthetics and related orthotics; or
(iv) canes, crutches, walkers, and bathtub grab bars.
(18)(l2)"Mobile pharmacy" means a Mobile pharmacy. – A pharmacy that meets all
of the following conditions:
Page 32 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a.(1) Is either self-propelled or moveable by another vehicle that is
self-propelled.
b.(2) Is operated by a nonprofit corporation.
c.(3) Dispenses prescription drugs at no charge or at a reduced charge to
persons whose family income is less than two hundred percent (200%)
of the federal poverty level and who do not receive reimbursement for
the cost of the dispensed prescription drugs from Medicare, Medicaid,
a private insurance company, or a governmental unit.
(19)(m)"Permit" means a Permit. – A permit to operate a pharmacy, deliver medical
equipment, or dispense devices, including a renewal license issued by the
Board.
(20)(n) "Person" means an Person. – An individual, corporation, partnership,
association, unit of government, or other legal entity.
(21)(o) "Person in loco parentis" means the Person in loco parentis. – The person who
has assumed parental responsibilities for a child.
(22)(p) "Pharmacist" means a Pharmacist. – A person licensed under this Article to
practice pharmacy.
(23)(q) "Pharmacy" means any Pharmacy. – A place where prescription drugs are
dispensed or compounded.
(24)(q1)"Pharmacy personnel" means pharmacists Pharmacy personnel. –
Pharmacists and pharmacy technicians.
(25)(q2)"Pharmacy technician" means a Pharmacy technician. – A person who may,
under the supervision of a pharmacist, perform technical functions to assist
the pharmacist in preparing and dispensing prescription medications.
(26)(r) "Practice of pharmacy" is as Practice of pharmacy. – As specified in
G.S. 90-85.3A.
(27)(s) "Prescription drug" means a Prescription drug. – A drug that under federal law
is required, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled with the
following statement: "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without
prescription."
(28)(t) "Prescription order" means a Prescription order. – A written or verbal order
for a prescription drug, prescription device, or pharmaceutical service from a
person authorized by law to prescribe such the drug, device, or service. A
prescription order The term includes an order entered in a chart or other
medical record of a patient.
(29)(u) "Unit dose medication system" means a Unit dose medication system. – A
system in which each dose of medication is individually packaged in a
properly sealed and properly labeled container."
SECTION 83.1.(b) G.S. 58-56A-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-56A-1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) 340B contract pharmacy. – Any A pharmacy under contract with a 340B
covered entity to dispense drugs on behalf of the 340B covered entity.
(2) 340B covered entity. – Any An entity defined in 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(A),
42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(C), 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(D), 42 U.S.C. §
256b(a)(4)(E), 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(I), 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(J), 42 U.S.C.
§ 256b(a)(4)(K), 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(N), or 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4)(O).
…
(5) Health benefit plan. – As defined Defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
(5a) High-deductible health plan. – As defined Defined under the Internal Revenue
Code.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 33

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Insured. – An individual covered by a health benefit plan.
(7) Insurer. – As defined Defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
…
(13) Pharmacy. – As defined in G.S. 90-85.3(q). Defined in G.S. 90-85.3.
(14) Pharmacy benefits manager. – An entity who that contracts with a pharmacy
on behalf of an insurer or third-party administrator to administer or manage
prescription drug benefits to perform any of the following functions:
…
(16a) Section 223. – Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code or its equivalent.
Code.
…
(17) Third-party administrator. – As defined Defined in G.S. 58-56-2."
SECTION 83.1.(c) G.S. 90-85.44 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-85.44. Drug, Supplies, and Medical Device Repository Program established.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
the following definitions apply:
(1) Board. – As defined Defined in G.S. 90-85.3.
(2) Dispense. – As defined Defined in G.S. 90-85.3.
(3) Drug. – As defined Defined in G.S. 90-85.3.
…
(7) Medical device. – A device as defined in G.S. 90-85.3(e). G.S. 90-85.3.
(8) Pharmacist. – As defined Defined in G.S. 90-85.3.
(9) Pharmacy. – As defined Defined in G.S. 90-85.3.
…
(11) Program. – The Drug, Supplies, and Medical Device Repository Program
established under this act. section.
(12) Supplies. – Supplies associated with or necessary for the administration of a
drug.
…
(c) Requirements of Participating Pharmacists or Free Clinics. – A pharmacist may
accept and dispense drugs, supplies, and medical devices donated to the Program to eligible
patients if all of the following requirements are met:
(1) The drug, supplies, supply, or medical device is in the original, unopened,
sealed, and tamper-evident packaging or, if packaged in single-unit doses, the
single-unit dose packaging is unopened.
(2) The pharmacist has determined that the drug, supplies, supply, or medical
device is safe for redistribution.
(3) The drug has not reached its expiration date.
(4) The drug, supplies, supply, or medical device is not adulterated or misbranded,
as determined by a pharmacist.
(5) The drug, supplies, supply, or medical device is prescribed by a practitioner
for use by an eligible patient and is dispensed by a pharmacist.
…
(h) Immunity. – The following limited immunities apply under the Program:
(1) Unless a pharmaceutical manufacturer exercises bad faith, the manufacturer
is not subject to criminal or civil liability for injury, death, or loss to a person
or to property for matters related to the donation, acceptance, or dispensing of
a drug or medical device manufactured by the manufacturer that is donated by
any a person under the Program, including liability for failure to transfer or
communicate product or consumer information or the expiration date of the
donated drug or medical device.
Page 34 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The following individuals or entities are immune from civil liability for an act
or omission that causes injury to or the death of an individual to whom the
drug, supplies, supply, or medical device is dispensed under the Program, and
no disciplinary action may be taken against a pharmacist or practitioner as
long as the drug, supplies, supply, or medical device is donated in accordance
with the requirements of this section:
…."
SECTION 83.1.(d) G.S. 106-140.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-140.1. Registration of producers of prescription drugs and devices.
(a) On or before December 31 of each year, every person doing business in North
Carolina and operating as a wholesaler, manufacturer, outsourcing facility, or repackager, as
those terms are defined in subsection (j) of this section, shall register with the Commissioner his
name and business location(s) in North Carolina. If said person has no business locations in
North Carolina, he shall register his name and location of his corporate offices. A person engaged
in business as a wholesale distributor, manufacturer, outsourcing facility, or repackager shall
register with the Commissioner immediately upon engaging in business in this State and annually
by the end of each calendar year. The registration shall include the person's name, each business
location in this State, and, if the person has no business location in this State, the location of the
person's principal place of business. As used in this subsection, "name" means the name of the
business establishment if the person is a business establishment.
(b) Every person, upon first operating as a wholesaler, manufacturer, outsourcing facility,
or repackager in North Carolina shall immediately register with the Commissioner his name,
place of business, and such establishment. If said person has no business locations in North
Carolina, he shall register his name and location of his corporate offices.
(c) Every person duly registered in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) subsection
(a) of this section shall register with the Commissioner any additional establishment that he the
person owns or operates in the State of North Carolina this State prior to doing business as a
manufacturer, wholesaler, wholesale distributor, outsourcing facility, or repackager.
(d) The Commissioner may assign a registration number to any a person or any an
establishment registered in accordance with this section.
(e) The Commissioner shall make a registration filed pursuant to this section available
for inspection to any person so requesting any registration filed pursuant to this section. by a
person that requests the registration.
(f) The following classes of people are exempt from the registration requirements of this
section:
(1) Pharmacists as defined in G.S. 90-85.3(q) G.S. 90-85.3 holding a valid permit
as defined in G.S. 90-85.3(m). pharmacy permit.
…
(4) Other classes of persons the Commissioner may by rule exempt from the
application of this section upon a finding that registration by these classes of
persons in accordance with this section is not necessary for the protection of
the public health.
(5) Wholesale distributors of prescription drugs licensed under G.S. 106-145.3.
(g) Every establishment in the State of North Carolina registered with the Commissioner
pursuant to this section shall be is subject to inspection pursuant to G.S. 106-140.
(h) The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement the registration requirements of
this section. These rules shall provide for an An annual registration fee of one thousand dollars
($1,000) for companies operating as applies to manufacturers, outsourcing facilities, or
repackagers and repackagers, and an annual registration fee of seven hundred dollars ($700.00)
for companies operating as wholesalers. applies to wholesale distributors. The Department of
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 35

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Agriculture and Consumer Services shall use these funds for the implementation of the North
Carolina Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. this Article.
(i) For the purposes of this act, name means the name of the partnership if a partnership
and the name of the corporation if a corporation.
(j) As used The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) The term "manufacturer" means a Manufacturer. – A person who that
prepares, derives, or produces a prescription drug. Pharmacists are specifically
excluded from this definition if they are acting in the course of their
professional practice as defined in Chapter 90 and rules adopted pursuant to
it.
(1a) The term "outsourcing facility" means a Outsourcing facility. – A
manufacturer at a single geographic location or address that is engaged in the
compounding of sterile drugs, has elected to register as an outsourcing facility
with the Food and Drug Administration, and complies with the requirements
as provided in 21 U.S.C. § 353b. Exemptions provided by 21 U.S.C. § 353b(a)
with respect to labeling, new drug registration, and distribution supply chain
requirements shall also apply to compounded drugs distributed in North
Carolina this State by an outsourcing facility.
(2) The term "prescription drug" means a Prescription drug. – A drug that under
federal law is required, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled
with the following statement: "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing
without a prescription.""Rx Only."
(3) The term "repackager" means a Repackager. – A person who that repacks,
relabels, or manipulates a prescription drug which that was in a unit packaged
and sealed by a manufacturer. Pharmacists are specifically exempted from this
definition if they are acting in the course of their professional practice as
defined in Chapter 90 and rules adopted pursuant to it.
(4) The term "wholesaler" means a Wholesale distributor. – A person acting as a
jobber, wholesale merchant, salvager, or broker, or agent thereof, who the
person's agent, that sells or distributes for resale a prescription drug.
Pharmacists are specifically exempted from this definition if they are acting
in the course of their professional practice as defined in Chapter 90 and rules
adopted pursuant to it."
SECTION 83.2. G.S. 95-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-4. Authority, powers Powers and duties of Commissioner.
The Commissioner of Labor shall be is the executive and administrative head of the
Department of Labor. In addition to the other powers and duties conferred upon the
Commissioner of Labor by this Article, Chapter, the said Commissioner shall have authority and
be charged with the duty: has the following powers and duties:
(1) To appoint and assign to duty such clerks, stenographers, and other employees
in the various divisions of the Department, as may be necessary to perform
the work of the Department, and to fix their compensation, subject to the
approval of the Department of Administration. The Commissioner of Labor
may assign or transfer stenographers, or clerks, from one division to another,
or inspectors from one division to another, or combine the clerical force of
two or more divisions, or require from one division assistance in the work of
another division, as he may consider necessary and advisable: Provided,
however, the provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the Industrial
Commission, or the Division of Workers' Compensation. compensation.
(2) To make such rules and regulations with reference to the work of the
Department and of the several divisions thereof as shall be necessary to
Page 36 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
properly carry out the duties imposed upon the said Commissioner and the
work of the Department. of the Department.
…
(4) To secure the enforcement of enforce all laws relating to the inspection of
factories, mercantile establishments, mills, workshops, public eating places,
and commercial institutions in the State. To aid him in the work, he shall have
power to State and to prosecute any violation of these laws. The
Commissioner may appoint factory inspectors and other assistants. The duties
of such inspectors and other assistants shall be prescribed by the
Commissioner of Labor. employees to assist with enforcing these laws.
(5) To visit and inspect, personally or through his assistants and factory
inspectors, inspectors or other employees, at reasonable hours, as often as
practicable, the factories, mercantile establishments, mills, workshops, public
eating places, and commercial institutions in the State, where goods, wares,
or merchandise are manufactured, purchased, or sold, at wholesale or retail.
any entity listed in subdivision (4) of this section.
(6) To enforce the provisions of this section and to prosecute refer to the
appropriate district attorney for prosecution all criminal violations of laws
relating to the inspection of factories, mercantile establishments, mills,
workshops, public eating houses, and commercial institutions in this State
before any court of competent jurisdiction. It shall be the duty of the district
attorney of the proper district upon the request of the Commissioner of Labor,
or any of his assistants or deputies, to prosecute any violation of a law, which
it is made the duty of the said Commissioner of Labor to enforce.any entity
listed in subdivision (4) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-6-9 and G.S. 114-2.3, to retain, designate,
employ, expend available funds for, and otherwise engage private counsel to
provide litigation services and represent the Department in any matter the
Commissioner deems necessary to represent the interests of the Department
and any of its component units, bureaus, officers, or employees. For the
purposes of In this subdivision, the terms "private counsel" and "litigation
services" are as defined in G.S. 147-17."
SECTION 84. G.S. 95-174 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-174. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(a)(1) "Chemical manufacturer" means a Chemical manufacturer. – A
manufacturing facility classified in North American Industry Classification
System (NAICS) Codes 31 through 33 where chemicals are produced for use
or distribution in North Carolina.
(b)(2) "Chemical name" means the Chemical name. – The scientific designation of
a chemical in accordance with the nomenclature system developed by the
International Union of Pure and Applied Chemistry (IUPAC), (IUPAC) or the
Chemical Abstracts Service (CAS) rules of nomenclature nomenclature, or a
name which will that clearly identify identifies the chemical for the purpose
of conducting a hazard evaluation.
(c)(3) "Common name" means any Common name. – A designation or identification
identification, such as a code name, code number, trade name, brand name
name, or generic name name, used to identify a chemical other than by its
chemical name.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 37

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d)(4) "Distributor" means any Distributor. – A business, other than a chemical
manufacturer or importer, which that supplies hazardous chemicals to other
distributors or to purchasers.
(e)(5) "Employee" means any Employee. – A person who is employed by an
employer under normal operating conditions.
(f)(6) "Employer" means a Employer. – A person engaged in business who that has
employees, including the State and its political subdivisions but excluding an
individual whose only employees are domestic workers or casual laborers who
are hired to work at the individual's residence.
(g)(7) "Facility" means one Facility. – One or more establishments, factories, or
buildings located at one contiguous site in North Carolina.
(h)(8) "Fire Chief" means Fire Fire Chief. – Fire Chief or Fire Marshall, or Marshal,
or, in the absence of a Fire Chief or Fire Marshal, the Emergency Response
Coordinator in the absence of a Fire Chief or Fire Marshall for the appropriate
local fire department.of the Fire Department.
(i) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 489, s. 1.
(j)(9) "Fire Department" means the Fire Department. – The fire department having
jurisdiction over the facility.
(k)(10) "Hazardous chemical" means any Hazardous chemical. – An element,
chemical compound compound, or mixture of elements and/or compounds
which elements, chemical compounds, or both that is a physical hazard or
health hazard as defined in subsection (c) of the OSHNC Standard or a
hazardous substance as defined in standards rules adopted by the Occupational
Safety and Health Division of the North Carolina Department of Labor in Title
13, Chapter 7 Chapter 7 of Title 13 of the North Carolina Administrative Code
(13 NCAC 7).
(l)(11) "Hazardous Substance List" means the Hazardous Substance List. – The list
required by G.S. 95-191.
(m)(12) "Hazardous substance trade secret" means any Hazardous substance trade
secret. – A formula, plan, pattern, device, process, production information,
or compilation of information, which is information that satisfies either of
the following requirements:
a. It meets all of the following criteria:
1. Is not patented, which is patented.
2. Is known only to the employer, the employer's licensees, the
employer's employees, and certain other individuals, and
which is individuals.
3. Is used or developed for use in the employer's business, and
which gives business.
4. Gives the employer possessing it the opportunity to obtain a
competitive advantage over businesses who that do not possess
it, or the secrecy of which it.
b. Its secrecy is certified by an appropriate official of the federal
government as necessary for national defense purposes. The
This term includes the chemical name and Chemical Abstracts Service
number of a substance shall be considered a trade secret only if the employer
can establish that the identity or composition of the substance cannot be
readily ascertained without undue expense by analytical techniques,
laboratory procedures, or other lawful means available to a competitor.
(n)(13) "Label" means any written, Label. – Written, printed, or graphic material
displayed on or affixed to containers of hazardous chemicals.
Page 38 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(o)(14) "Manufacturing facility" means a Manufacturing facility. – A facility
classified in NAICS Code Codes 31 through 33 which that manufactures or
uses a hazardous chemical or chemicals in North Carolina.
(p) Recodified as subsection (t) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.
(q)(15) "Nonmanufacturing facility" means any Nonmanufacturing facility. – A
facility in North Carolina Carolina, other than a facility classified in NAICS
Code Codes 31 through 33, the State of North Carolina (and and its local
political subdivisions) subdivisions, and volunteer emergency service
organizations whose members may might be exposed to chemical hazards
during emergency situations.
(r)(16) "OSHNC Standard" means the OSHNC Standard. – The current Hazard
Communication Standard adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health
Division of the North Carolina Department of Labor in Title 13, Chapter 7
Chapter 7 of Title 13 of the North Carolina Administrative Code (13 NCAC
7).
(s)(17) "Storage and Container" has the "Storage" and "container." – Have their
ordinary meaning however it does but do not include pipes used in the transfer
of substances or the fuel tanks of self-propelled internal combustion vehicles.
(t)(18) "Safety Data Sheets" or "SDS" means chemical Safety data sheets (SDS). –
Chemical information sheets adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health
Division of the North Carolina Department of Labor in Title 13, Chapter 7
Chapter 7 of Title 13 of the North Carolina Administrative Code (13 NCAC
7)."
SECTION 85.(a) G.S. 100-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 100-5. Duties as to buildings erected or remodeled by State.
Upon request of the Governor and the Board of Public Buildings and Grounds, Department
of Administration, the North Carolina Historical Commission shall act in an advisory capacity
relative to the artistic character of any building constructed, erected, or remodeled by the State.
The term "building" as used in this section shall include includes structures intended for human
occupation, occupation and also bridges, arches, gates, walls, or other permanent structures of
any character not intended primarily for purposes of decoration or commemoration."
SECTION 85.(b) G.S. 143-244 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-244. Location of offices.
The Board of Public Buildings and Grounds Department of Administration shall provide the
Commission with offices in the city of Raleigh, North Carolina."
SECTION 85.(c) Article 29 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 85.(d) Article 31C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 85.1.(a) G.S. 105-278.6A reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-278.6A. Qualified retirement facility.
(a) Classification. – Buildings, the land they actually occupy, additional adjacent land
reasonably necessary for the convenient use of the buildings, and personal property owned by a
qualified retirement facility and used in the operation of that facility are designated a special class
of property under Section 2(2) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution and are excluded
from taxation to the extent provided in this section.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in section:
…
(3) Financial reporting period. – The calendar year or tax year ending prior to
before the date the retirement facility applies for an exclusion under this
section.
…
(5) Retirement facility. – A community that meets all of the following conditions:
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 39

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. It is licensed under Article 64 64A of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
b. It is designed for elderly residents.
c. It includes independent living units for elderly residents.
d. It includes a skilled nursing facility or an adult care facility.
…
(c) Total Exclusion. – A retirement facility qualifies for total exclusion under this section
if it meets all of the following conditions:
(1) It is exempt from tax under Article 4 of this Chapter and private shareholders
do not benefit from its operations.
(2) All of its revenues, less operating and capital expenses, are applied to
providing uncompensated goods and services to the elderly and to the local
community, community or are applied to an endowment or a reserve for these
purposes.
(3) Its charter provides that that, in the event of dissolution, its assets will revert
or be conveyed to an entity that is organized exclusively for charitable,
educational, scientific, or religious purposes, purposes and is an exempt
organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Code.
…."
SECTION 85.1.(b) The amendment to G.S. 105-278.6A(b)(5)a. by subsection (a) of
this section is retroactively effective December 1, 2025. The remainder of this section is effective
when it becomes law.
SECTION 86.(a) Subsection (a1) and subdivisions (a2)(1), (a2)(3), (a2)(4), and
(a2)(5) of G.S. 116-15 are recodified as subsection (a) and subdivisions (a2)(3), (a2)(4), (a2)(5),
and (a2)(1), respectively, of that section.
SECTION 86.(b) G.S. 116-15, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 116-15. Licensing of certain nonpublic post-secondary postsecondary educational
institutions.
(a) Policy. – The General Assembly of North Carolina in recognition of the importance
of higher education and of the particular significance attached to the personal credentials
accessible through higher education and in consonance with statutory law of this State making
unlawful any "unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce,"
hereby declares it the policy of this State that all institutions conducting post-secondary
postsecondary degree activity in this State that are not subject to Chapter 115 Chapter 115C or
115D of the General Statutes, nor some other section of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes shall
be Statutes or another section of this Chapter are subject to licensure under this section except as
the institution or a particular activity of the institution may be exempt from licensure by one or
another provision of otherwise provided by this section.
(a1) Recodified.
(a2) Definitions. – As used in this section the following terms are defined as set forth in
this subsection:The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) "Board". – Board. – The Board of Governors of The University of North
Carolina.
(2) "Institution". – Any Institution. – A sole proprietorship, group, partnership,
venture, society, company, corporation, school, college, or university that
engages in, purports to engage in, or intends to engage in any type of
post-secondary postsecondary degree activity.
(3) "Post-secondary degree". – Postsecondary degree. – A credential conferring
on the its recipient thereof the title of "Associate", "Bachelor", "Master", or
"Doctor", "Associate," "Bachelor," "Master," or "Doctor," or an equivalent
Page 40 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
title, signifying educational attainment based on (i) study, (ii) a substitute for
study in the form of equivalent experience or achievement testing, or (iii) a
combination of the foregoing; provided, that "post-secondary degree" shall
these. The term does not include any an honorary degree or other so-called
"unearned" degree.
(4) "Post-secondary degree activity". – Any of the following is "post-secondary
degree activity":Postsecondary degree activity. – Any of the following:
a. Awarding a post-secondary postsecondary degree.
b. Conducting or offering study, experience, or testing for an individual
or certifying prior successful completion by an individual of study,
experience, or testing, testing under the representation that the
individual successfully completing the study, experience, or testing
will be awarded therefor, awarded, at least in part, a post-secondary
postsecondary degree.
(5) "Publicly registered name". – Publicly registered name. – The name of any
sole proprietorship, group, partnership, venture, society, company,
corporation, school, college, or an institution that appears as is the subject of
any Articles of Incorporation, Articles of Amendment, or a Certificate of
Authority to Transact Business or to Conduct Affairs, properly Affairs filed
with the Secretary of State of North Carolina and currently in force.
(b) Required License. – No institution subject to this section shall undertake
post-secondary postsecondary degree activity in this State, whether through itself or through an
agent, unless the institution is licensed as provided in under this section to conduct
post-secondary postsecondary degree activity or is exempt from licensure under this section as
hereinafter provided.section.
(c) Exemption from Licensure. – Any Grandfather Exemption. – An institution that has
been continuously conducting post-secondary postsecondary degree activity in this State under
the same publicly registered name or series of publicly registered names since July 1, 1972, shall
be is exempt from the provisions for licensure under this section upon presentation to the Board
of information acceptable to the Board to substantiate such post-secondary the postsecondary
degree activity and public registration of the institution's names. Any An institution that, pursuant
to a predecessor statute to this subsection, had presented to the Board proof of activity and
registration such and that the Board granted exemption from licensure, shall continue to enjoy
such exemption licensure continues to be exempt without further action by the Board.
(d) Exemption of Institutions Relative to Religious Education. – Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, no institution shall be subject to Religious Education Exemption.
– An institution is exempt from licensure under this section with respect to post-secondary
postsecondary degree activity based upon a program of study, equivalent experience, or
achievement testing the institutionally planned objective of which that is designed for the
attainment of a degree in theology, divinity, or religious education or in any other program of
study, equivalent experience, or achievement testing that is designed by the institution primarily
for career preparation in a religious vocation. This exemption shall be extended to any institution
with respect applies to each program of study, equivalent experience, and or achievement test
that the institution demonstrates testing that, as demonstrated by the institution to the satisfaction
of the Board should be exempt Board, meets the requirements for exemption under this
subsection.
(e) Post-secondary Degree Activity within the Armed Forces of the United States. – To
the extent that an Military Exemption. – An institution that undertakes post-secondary
postsecondary degree activity on the premises of military posts or reservations located in this
State for military personnel stationed on active duty there, or their dependents, the institution
shall be is exempt from the licensure requirements of this section.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 41

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) Standards for Licensure. – To receive a license to conduct post-secondary
postsecondary degree activity in this State, an institution shall satisfy the Board that the
institution has met meets all of the following standards:
(1) That the The institution is State-chartered. If State-chartered or, if chartered
by a state or sovereignty other than North Carolina, the institution shall also
obtain has a Certificate of Authority to Transact Business or to Conduct
Affairs in North Carolina issued by the Secretary of State of North
Carolina;Carolina.
(2) That the The institution has been conducting post-secondary postsecondary
degree activity in a state or sovereignty other than North Carolina during
consecutive, regular-term, academic semesters, exclusive of summer sessions,
for at least the two years immediately prior to submitting an application for
licensure under this section, or has been conducting with enrolled students,
for a like period in this State or some other state or sovereignty,
post-secondary postsecondary educational activity not related to a
post-secondary degree; provided, that an postsecondary degree. An institution
that qualifies for an interim permit under rules adopted under subsection (i) of
this section may be temporarily relieved of this standard under the conditions
set forth in subsection (i), below;this standard.
(3) That the The substance of each course or program of study, equivalent
experience, or achievement test is such as may testing reasonably and
adequately achieve achieves the stated objective for which the study,
experience, or test testing is offered or is to be certified as successfully
completed;completed.
(4) That the The institution has adequate space, equipment, instructional
materials, and personnel available to it to provide education of good
quality;quality.
(5) That the The education, experience, and other qualifications of directors,
administrators, supervisors, and instructors are such as may reasonably insure
ensure that the students will receive, or will be reliably certified to have
received, education consistent with the stated objectives of any course or
program of study, equivalent experience, or achievement test testing offered
by the institution;institution.
(6) That the The institution provides students and other interested persons with a
catalog or brochure containing information describing the substance,
objectives, and duration of the study, equivalent experience, and or
achievement testing offered, a schedule of related tuition, fees, and all other
necessary charges and expenses, cancellation and refund policies, and such
other material facts concerning the institution and the program or course of
study, equivalent experience, and or achievement testing as that are
reasonably likely to affect the decision of the student to enroll therein, enroll,
together with any other disclosures that may be specified by the Board; and
that such Board. This information is shall be provided to prospective students
prior to enrollment;enrollment.
(7) That upon Upon satisfactory completion of study, equivalent experience, or
achievement test, testing, the student is given appropriate educational
credentials by the institution, indicating that the relevant study, equivalent
experience, or achievement testing has been satisfactorily completed by the
students;student.
Page 42 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) That records Records are maintained by the institution adequate to reflect the
application of relevant performance or grading standards to each enrolled
student;student.
(9) That the The institution is maintained and operated in compliance with all
pertinent ordinances and laws, including rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, laws relative to the safety and health of all persons upon the
premises of the institution;institution.
(10) That the The institution is financially sound and capable of fulfilling its
commitments to students and that the institution has provided a bond as
provided in subsection (f1) of this section;section.
(11) That the The institution, through itself or those with whom which it may
contract, does not engage in promotion, sales, collection, credit, or other
practices of any type which that are false, deceptive, misleading, or
unfair;unfair.
(12) That the The chief executive officer, trustees, directors, owners,
administrators, supervisors, staff, instructors, and employees of the institution
have no record of unprofessional conduct or incompetence that would
reasonably call into question the overall quality of the institution;institution.
(13) That the The student housing owned, maintained, or approved by the
institution, if any, is appropriate, safe, and adequate;adequate.
(14) That the The institution has a fair and equitable cancellation and refund policy;
andpolicy.
(15) That no No person or agency with whom which the institution contracts has a
record of unprofessional conduct or incompetence that would reasonably call
into question the overall quality of the institution.
(f1) Guaranty Bond. –
(1) A guaranty bond is required for each institution that is licensed. The Board
may revoke the license of an institution that fails to maintain a bond pursuant
to this subsection.
If the institution has provided a bond pursuant to G.S. 115D-95, the Board
may waive the bond requirement under this subsection. The Board may shall
not waive the bond requirement under this subsection if the applicant has
provided an alternative to a guaranty bond under G.S. 115D-95(c).
(2) When an application is made for a license or license renewal, the applicant
shall file a guaranty bond with the clerk of the superior court of the county in
which the institution will be located. The bond shall be in favor of the students.
The bond shall be executed by the applicant as principal and by a bonding
company authorized to do business in this State. The bond shall be conditioned
to provide indemnification to any student, or his the student's parent or
guardian, who has suffered a loss of tuition or any fees by reason of the failure
of the institution to offer or complete student instruction, academic services,
or other goods and services related to course enrollment for any reason,
including the suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of an institution's license,
bankruptcy, foreclosure, or the institution ceasing to operate.
The bond shall be in an amount determined by the Board to be adequate
to provide indemnification to any student, or his the student's parent or
guardian, under the terms of the bond. The bond amount for an institution shall
be at least equal to the maximum amount of prepaid tuition held at any time
during the last fiscal year by the institution. The bond amount shall also be at
least ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 43

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Each application for a license shall include a letter signed by an authorized
representative of the institution showing in detail the calculations made and
the method of computing the amount of the bond, bond pursuant to this
subdivision and the rules of the Board. If the Board finds that the calculations
made and the method of computing the amount of the bond are inaccurate or
that the amount of the bond is otherwise inadequate to provide indemnification
under the terms of the bond, the Board may require the applicant to provide
an additional bond.
The bond shall remain in force and effect until cancelled by the guarantor.
The guarantor may cancel the bond upon 30 days days' notice to the Board.
Cancellation of the bond shall does not affect any a liability incurred or
accrued prior to the termination of the notice period.
(g) Review of Licensure. – Any institution that acquires licensure under this section shall
be subject to review by the Board to determine that the institution continues to meet the standard
for licensure of subsection (f), above. Review of such licensure by the Board shall always occur
if the institution is legally reconstituted, or if ownership of a preponderance of all the assets of
the institution changes pursuant to a single transaction or agreement or a recognizable sequence
of transactions or agreements, or if two years has elapsed since licensure of the institution was
granted by the Board.
Notwithstanding the foregoing paragraph, if an institution has continued to be licensed under
this section and continuously conducted post-secondary degree activity in this State under the
same publicly registered name or series of publicly registered names since July 1, 1979, or for
six consecutive years, whichever is the shorter period, and is accredited by an accrediting
commission recognized by the Council on Post-Secondary Accreditation, such institution shall
be subject to licensure review by the Board every six years to determine that the institution
continues to meet the standard for licensure of subsection (f), above. However, should such an
institution cease to maintain the specified accreditation, become legally reconstituted, have
ownership of a preponderance of all its assets transferred pursuant to a single transaction or
agreement or a recognizable sequence of transactions or agreements to a person or organization
not licensed under this section, or fail to meet the standard for licensure of subsection (f), above,
then the institution shall be subject to licensure review by the Board every two years until a
license to conduct post-secondary degree activity and the requisite accreditation have been
restored for six consecutive years.The Board shall review an institution licensed under this
section to determine if the institution continues to meet the standards in subsection (f) of this
section when any of the following occurs:
(1) Two years have elapsed since licensure of the institution, unless subdivision
(2) of this subsection applies.
(2) Six years have elapsed since licensure of the institution and, throughout this
period, the institution has maintained its license, has continuously conducted
postsecondary degree activity in this State under the same publicly registered
name or series of publicly registered names, and has been accredited by an
accrediting commission recognized by the Council for Higher Education
Accreditation. An institution reviewed under this subdivision that
subsequently loses its accreditation or experiences a change that requires a
review under subdivision (3) or (4) of this subsection becomes subject to
review on a two-year basis until the institution again qualifies for a six-year
review under this subdivision.
(3) The institution is legally reconstituted.
(4) Ownership of a preponderance of the assets of the institution changes pursuant
to a single transaction or agreement or a recognizable sequence of transactions
or agreements.
Page 44 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) Denial and Revocation of Licensure. – Any An institution seeking licensure under the
provisions of this section that fails to meet the licensure requirements of this section shall be
denied a license to conduct post-secondary postsecondary degree activity in this State. Any A
licensed institution holding a license to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State that
is found by the Board of Governors not to finds does not satisfy the licensure requirements of
this section shall have its license to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State revoked
by the Board; provided, that the Board of Governors may continue in force the license of an
institution deemed by the Board Board, unless the Board considers the institution to be making
substantial and expeditious progress toward remedying its licensure deficiencies.deficiencies and
allows the license to remain in effect.
(i) Regulatory Authority in the Board. – Authority. – The Board shall have authority to
establish such rules, regulations, and procedures as it may deem necessary or appropriate may
adopt rules to effect the provisions of this section. Such rules, regulations, and procedures may
include provision for the granting of These rules may grant an interim permit to conduct
post-secondary postsecondary degree activity in this State to an institution seeking licensure but
lacking the two-year period of activity prescribed by subsection (f)(2), above.subdivision (f)(2)
of this section.
(j) Enforcement Authority in the Attorney General. – Attorney General Notification. –
The Board shall call to the attention of notify the Attorney General, for such action as he may
deem appropriate, any institution failing General if an institution fails to comply with the
requirements of this section.
(k) Severability. – The provisions of this section are severable, and, if any provision of
this section is declared unconstitutional or invalid by the courts, such the declaration shall does
not affect the validity of the section as a whole or any provision other than the provision so
declared to be unconstitutional or invalid."
SECTION 86.(c) G.S. 116-209.16A reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-209.16A. Information on career and major options.
(a) Know Before You Go. – The Authority shall provide information on a website, under
a section entitled "Know Before You Go," to students and parents to assist in selection of major
and career options as provided in this section. The information shall be updated annually.
(b) Career Options. – The Authority shall, as data is available, provide information on
projected employment needs in the labor economy and associated salary ranges for those areas
of employment, college majors which that may fulfill those needs, and institutions of higher
education that may provide those majors. The Authority may use existing sources of public
information, such as the employment projections produced by the federal Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics, to develop this information.
…
(d) Public and Private Institutions of Higher Education. – For the purposes of this section,
"public institutions of higher education" shall include the constituent institutions of The
University of North Carolina and the community colleges under the jurisdiction of the State
Board of Community Colleges Colleges, and "private institutions of higher education" shall
include postsecondary institutions that award postsecondary degrees, as defined in
G.S. 116-15(a2)(1).G.S. 116-15(a2)."
SECTION 86.(d) Subdivisions (1) and (3) of G.S. 143-552 are recodified as
subdivisions (3) and (5), respectively, of that section.
SECTION 86.(e) G.S. 143-552, as amended by subsection (d) of this section, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 143-552. Definitions.
As used in this Part:The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Community college. – Defined in G.S. 115D-2.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 45

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) "Employee" means any person Employee. – An individual who is appointed
to or hired and employed by an employing entity under this Part and whose
salary is paid paid, in whole or in part part, by State funds.
(3) "Employing entity" means and includes:Employing entity. – Any of the
following:
a. Any A State entity enumerated in G.S. 143B-3 of the Executive
Organization Act of 1973;entity.
b. Any city or county A local board of education under Chapter 115 of
the General Statutes; oreducation.
c. Any The board of trustees of a community college under Chapter 115D
of the General Statutes.college.
(4) Local board of education. – Defined in G.S. 115C-5(5).
(5) "Net disposable earnings" means the Net disposable earnings. – The salary
paid to an employee by an employing entity after deduction of withholdings
for taxes, social security, State retirement retirement, or any other sum
obligated by law to be withheld.
(6) State entity. – An entity described in G.S. 143B-3."
SECTION 86.(f) G.S. 143-553 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-553. Conditional continuing employment; notification among employing entities;
repayment election.
(a) All persons employed by an employing entity as defined by this Part who owe An
employee who owes money to the State and whose salaries are paid in whole or in part by State
funds must make full restitution of the amount owed as a condition of continuing employment;
provided, however, that no employing entity shall terminate for failure to make full restitution
the employment of such an employee who owes employment unless the money is owed to the
University of North Carolina Health Care System or to East Carolina University's Division of
Health Sciences for health care services.
(b) Whenever a representative of any an employing entity as defined by this Part has
knowledge that an employee owes money to the State and is delinquent in satisfying this
obligation, the representative shall notify the employing entity. Upon receipt of notification an
employing entity shall terminate the employee's employment if after written notice of his right
to do so he if, after written notice, the employee does not repay the money within a reasonable
period of time; provided, however, that where time. If, however, there is a genuine dispute as to
whether the money is owed or how much is owed, or there is an unresolved issue concerning
insurance coverage, the employee shall not be dismissed as long as he the employee is pursuing
administrative or judicial remedies to have the dispute or the issue resolved.
(c) An employee of any employing entity who has elected in writing to allow not less
than ten percent (10%) of his the employee's net disposable earnings to be periodically withheld
for application towards a debt to the State shall be deemed is considered to be repaying the money
within a reasonable period of time and shall not have his employment be terminated so long as
he is consenting to repayment according to such terms. Furthermore, the employing entity shall
allow the employee who for from employment as long as either of the following applies:
(1) The employee is making payments in accordance with the election.
(2) For some extraordinary reason reason, the employee is incapable of repaying
the obligation to the State according to the preceding terms to continue
employment as long as he of the election but is attempting repayment in good
faith under his the employee's present financial circumstances, but shall
promptly terminate the employee's employment if he ceases to make payments
or discontinues a good faith effort to make repayment.circumstances."
SECTION 86.(g) G.S. 143-554 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-554. Right of employee appeal.
Page 46 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Any An employee or former employee of an employing entity within the meaning of
G.S. 143-552(1)a of a State entity whose employment is terminated pursuant to the provisions of
this Part shall be given the opportunity to appeal the employment termination to the State Human
Resources Commission according to the normal appeal and hearing procedures provided by
Chapter 126 and the State Human Resources Commission rules adopted pursuant to the authority
of that Chapter; however, nothing herein shall be construed to give the right to termination
reviews to anyone exempt from that right under G.S. 126-5.and who is subject to Article 8 of
Chapter 126 of the General Statutes may appeal the termination as if it were a final agency
decision issued under G.S. 126-34.01.
(b) Before the employment of an employee of a local board of education within the
meaning of G.S. 143-552(1)b who is either a superintendent, supervisor, principal, teacher
teacher, or other professional person is terminated pursuant to this Part, the local board of
education shall comply with the provisions of G.S. 115-142. Part 3 of Article 22 of Chapter 115C
of the General Statutes. If the termination of an employee within the meaning of G.S.
143-552(1)b is other than one whose termination is made of a local board of education is not
reviewable pursuant to G.S. 115-142, he Part 3 of Article 22 of Chapter 115C of the General
Statutes, the employee shall be given the opportunity for a hearing before the local board of
education prior to the termination of his employment.
(c) Before the employment of an employee of a board of trustees of a community college
within the meaning of G.S. 143-552(1)c is finally terminated pursuant to this Part, he the
employee shall be given the opportunity for a hearing before the board of trustees."
SECTION 86.(h) G.S. 143-555 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-555. Definitions.
As used in this Part:The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) "Appointing authority" means the Appointing authority. – The Governor,
Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the
House, President pro tempore Pro Tempore of the Senate, members of the
Council of State, all heads of the executive departments of State government,
the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, and any other
State person or group of State persons authorized by law to appoint to a public
office.
(2) "Employing entity" means and includes:
a. Any State entity enumerated in G.S. 143B-3 of the Executive
Organization Act of 1973;
b. Any city or county board of education under Chapter 115 of the
General Statutes; or
c. Any board of trustees of a community college under Chapter 115D of
the General Statutes.
(3) "Public office" means appointive Public office. – Appointive membership on
any a State Commission, council, committee, board, including occupational
licensing boards as defined in G.S. 93B-1, board of trustees, including boards
of constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and boards of
community colleges under Chapter 115D of the General Statutes, and any
other State agency created by law; provided that "public office" law. The term
does not include an office for which a regular salary is paid to the holder as
an employee of the State or of one of its departments, agencies, or institutions.
(4) "Public official" means any person who is a member of any public office as
defined by this Part.Public official. – A person who holds a public office."
SECTION 86.(i) G.S. 143-556 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-556. Notification of the appointing authority; investigation.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 47

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Whenever a representative of an employing entity as defined by this Part has knowledge that
a public official owes money to the State and is delinquent in satisfying this obligation, the
representative shall notify the appointing authority who appointed the public official in question.
Upon receipt of notification the appointing authority shall investigate the circumstances of the
claim of money owed to the State for purposes of determining if a debt is owed and its amount."
SECTION 86.(j) G.S. 143-558 is repealed.
SECTION 86.(k) G.S. 143-559 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-559. Notification to the Legislative Ethics Committee; investigation.
Whenever a representative of any an employing entity as defined by this Part has knowledge
that a legislator owes money to the State and is delinquent in satisfying this obligation, this
information shall be reported to the Legislative Ethics Committee established pursuant to Chapter
120, Article 14 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes for disposition."
SECTION 86.(l) G.S. 153A-234 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-234. Fire marshal.
(a) A county may appoint a fire marshal and employ persons as his the fire marshal's
assistants. A county may also impose any duty that might be imposed on a fire marshal on any
other officer or employee of the county. The board of commissioners shall set the duties of the
fire marshal, which marshal. These duties may include but are not limited to:to the following:
…
(5) Making fire prevention inspections, including the periodic inspections and
reports of school buildings required by Chapter 115 G.S. 115C-525 and the
inspections of child care facilities required by Chapter 110. G.S. 110-91(5). A
fire marshal shall not make electrical inspections unless he is qualified to do
so under G.S. 153A-351.
(b) The fire marshal, or the fire marshal's designee, shall obtain a criminal history record
check for an applicant over the age of 18 prior to offering that applicant a paid or volunteer
position with the fire department. The criminal history record check shall be conducted and
evaluated as provided in G.S. 143B-1209.23 [G.S. 143B-1209.24], G.S. 143B-1209.24, or, if an
applicant has been a resident of North Carolina for over five years and reports no charges or
convictions on the application, the record check requirement of this section may be conducted
through the county clerk of court or a third-party vendor."
SECTION 86.(m) G.S. 159-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 159-7. Short title; definitions; local acts superseded.
(a) This Article may be cited as "The Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act."
(b) The words and phrases defined in this section have the meanings indicated when used
in this Article, unless the context clearly requires another meaning.The following definitions
apply in this Article:
(1) "Budget" is a Budget. – A proposed plan for raising and spending money for
specified programs, functions, activities activities, or objectives during a fiscal
year.
(2) "Budget ordinance" is the Budget ordinance. – An ordinance that levies taxes
and appropriates revenues for specified purposes, functions, activities, or
objectives during a fiscal year.
(3) "Budget year" is the Budget year. – The fiscal year for which a budget is
proposed or a budget ordinance is adopted.
(4) "Debt service" is the Debt service. – The sum of money required to pay
installments of principal and interest on bonds, notes, and other evidences of
debt accruing within a fiscal year, to maintain sinking funds, and to pay
installments on debt instruments issued pursuant to Article 7A of this Chapter
or Chapter 159G of the General Statutes and accruing within a fiscal year.
(5), (6) Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 2.
Page 48 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) "Fiscal year" is the Fiscal year. – The annual period for the compilation of
fiscal operations, as prescribed in G.S. 159-8(b).
(8) "Fund" is a Fund. – A fiscal and accounting entity with a self-balancing set of
accounts recording cash and other resources, together with all related
liabilities and residual equities or balances, and changes therein, for the
purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain objectives in
accordance with special regulations, restrictions, or limitations.
(9) Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 2.
(10) "Public authority" is a Public authority. – A municipal corporation (other
corporation, other than a unit of local government) government, that is not
subject to the State Budget Act (Chapter 143C of the General Statutes)
Chapter 143C (State Budget Act) of the General Statutes or a local
governmental authority, board, commission, council, or agency that (i) is not
a municipal corporation, (ii) is not subject to the State Budget Act, and (iii)
operates on an area, regional, or multi-unit basis, and the budgeting and
accounting systems of which are not fully a part of the budgeting and
accounting systems of a unit of local government.
(11) Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 2.
(12) "Sinking fund" means a Sinking fund. – A fund held for the retirement of term
bonds.
(13) "Special district" is a Special district. – A unit of local government (other
government, other than a county, city, town, or incorporated village) village,
that is created for the performance of limited governmental functions or for
the operation of a particular utility or public service enterprises.
(14) "Taxes" do not Taxes. – Does not include special assessments.
(15) "Unit," "unit of local government," or "local government" is a Unit, unit of
local government, or local government. – A municipal corporation that is not
subject to the State Budget Act (Chapter 143C of the General Statutes)
Chapter 143C (State Budget Act) of the General Statutes and that has the
power to levy taxes, including a consolidated city-county, as defined by
G.S. 160B-2(1), G.S. 160B-2, and all boards, agencies, commissions,
authorities, and institutions thereof that are not municipal corporations.
(16) "Vending facilities" has the same meaning as it does in G.S. 111-42(d), but
Vending facilities. – Defined in G.S. 111-42. The term also means any
mechanical or electronic device dispensing items or something of value or
entertainment or services for a fee, regardless of the method of activation, and
regardless of the means of payment, whether by coin, currency, tokens, or
other means.
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly by enactment of this Article to prescribe for
local governments and public authorities a uniform system of budget adoption and administration
and fiscal control. To this end and except as otherwise provided in this Article, all provisions of
general laws, city charters, and local acts in effect as of July 1, 1973 1973, and in conflict with
the provisions of Part 1 or Part 3 of this Article are repealed. No general law, city charter, or local
act enacted or taking effect after July 1, 1973, may shall be construed to modify, amend, or repeal
any portion of Part 1 or Part 3 of this Article unless it expressly so provides by specific reference
to the appropriate section.
(d) Except as expressly provided herein, otherwise in this Article, this Article does not
apply to local school administrative units. The adoption and administration of budgets for the
public school system and the management of the fiscal affairs of local school administrative units
are governed by the School Budget and Fiscal Control Act, Chapter 115, Article 9. However, this
Article 31 (The School Budget and Fiscal Control Act) of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 49

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
This Article and the School Budget and Fiscal Control Act shall be construed together to the end
that the administration of the fiscal affairs of counties and local school administrative units may
be most effectively and efficiently administered.
…."
SECTION 86.5. G.S. 116B-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116B-6. Administration of Escheat Fund; Escheat Account.
(a) Escheat Account. – All funds received by the Treasurer as escheated or abandoned
property and which were transferred prior to January 1, 1980, to the trust fund created under
G.S. 116-209 shall remain in that trust fund and shall be placed in a special fund, designated the
"Escheat Account."The Escheat Account is established as a special fund in the Reserve Trust
Fund created under G.S. 116-209.
(b) Investment and Transfer of Assets; Income. – The Treasurer is the trustee of the
Escheat Account and has full power to invest and reinvest the assets of the Escheat Account and
the Escheat Fund. Subject to the Treasurer's withholding an amount necessary to accomplish the
Treasurer's duties as set out in this Chapter, including subsections (e), (f) (f), and (g) of this
section, the Treasurer shall transfer, at least annually, to the Escheat Account all moneys then in
the Treasurer's custody received as, or derived from the disposition of, escheated and abandoned
property and shall disburse to the State Education Assistance Authority, as provided in
G.S. 116B-7, the income derived from the investment of the Escheat Account and the Escheat
Fund. All moneys transferred to the Escheat Account under this section shall be accounted for
and administered separately from other assets and money in the trust fund Reserve Trust Fund
created under G.S. 116-209.
(c) Security Interest in Escheat Account. – The State Education Assistance Authority, in
addition to other powers vested under G.S. 116-201 to G.S. 116-209.23, inclusive, is authorized
to Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, may pledge and or vest a security interest
in all or any part of the Escheat Account, by resolution adopted or trust agreement approved by
it, as security for or insurance respecting the payment of bonds or other obligations, as defined
in G.S. 116-201, including principal, interest interest, and redemption premium, if any; provided,
that such premium. A pledge and of or security interest in the Escheat Account shall, in the
determination of the Authority, constitute a use of the Escheat Fund to aid worthy and needy
students who are residents of this State and are enrolled in public institutions of higher education
in this State. The Authority may submit to the Treasurer, from time to time as it deems necessary,
Treasurer requisitions for transfers of money in the Escheat Account to pay such bonds and other
obligations to the extent necessary under such the pledge of, or security interest in, the Escheat
Account, or any part thereof, and the Treasurer is authorized and directed to shall pay such money
so requisitioned this money to the Authority for such these purposes.
(d) Limitation on Amount of Obligations Secured. – The principal amount of bonds and
other obligations insured or secured by the Escheat Account shall not exceed 10 times the amount
held for the credit of the Escheat Account, as certified from time to time by the Treasurer, and,
in no event, shall exceed three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000). If the amount held
for the credit of the Escheat Account, as certified by the Treasurer, shall be is ten percent (10%)
or less of the principal amount of the bonds and other obligations so insured or secured, the
Authority shall not issue any additional bonds or cause additional obligations to be insured or
secured by the Escheat Account until such time as the amount held for the credit of the Escheat
Account exceeds ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the bonds and other obligations
secured or insured by the Escheat Account.
(e) Use of Excess Funds. – If the amount held for the credit of the Escheat Account at
any time shall exceed the sum of exceeds thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000), such the
excess may be used by the State Education Assistance Authority, with the written approval of
the Treasurer, for the purpose of either (i) making student loans or (ii) refunding outstanding
bonds or other obligations issued by the Authority and secured by a pledge of, or a security
Page 50 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
interest in, the Escheat Account. Any excess so The excess used shall be repaid by the Authority
to the Escheat Account in the manner agreed between the Authority and the Treasurer.
(f) Refund Reserve. – The Treasurer shall retain in the Escheat Fund, as a permanent
refund reserve, either the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or a sum equal to the total
value of escheated or abandoned property received in the preceding fiscal year, whichever is
greater, for the purpose of payment of refunds of escheated or abandoned property to persons
entitled thereto.to them.
(g) Additional Funds for Refunds. – If at any time the amount of the refund reserve shall
be is insufficient to make refunds required to be made, the Treasurer, in addition, Treasurer may
use all current receipts derived from escheated or abandoned property, exclusive of earnings and
profits on investments of the Escheat Fund and the Escheat Account, for the purpose of making
such refunds; and if all such funds shall be inadequate for such refunds, refunds. If these funds
are insufficient to make refunds, the Treasurer may apply to the Council of State, pursuant to the
State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, to the limit of funds available from the
Contingency and Emergency Fund, for a loan, without interest, to supply any deficiencies, in
whole or in part. No receipts derived from escheated or abandoned property, other than earnings
or profits on investments, shall be paid to the Authority until: (i) all valid claims for refund have
been paid; (ii) the reserve for refund shall equal equals five million dollars ($5,000,000); and (iii)
the amount loaned from the Contingency and Emergency Fund shall have has been repaid by the
Escheat Fund.
(h) Expenditures. – The Treasurer may expend the funds in the Escheat Fund, other than
funds in the Escheat Account, for the payment of the following:
(1) claims Claims for refunds to owners, holders holders, and claimants under
G.S. 116B-4; for the payment of G.S. 116B-4.
(2) costs Costs of maintenance and upkeep of abandoned or escheated property;
property.
(3) costs Costs of preparing lists of names of owners of abandoned property to be
furnished to clerks of superior court; court.
(4) costs Costs of notice and publication; publication.
(5) costs Costs of appraisals; appraisals.
(6) fees Fees of persons employed pursuant to G.S. 116B-8 G.S. 116B-8.
(7) costs Costs involved in determining whether a decedent died without heirs;
heirs.
(8) fees of persons employed pursuant to G.S. 116B-8 to conduct audits; costs
Costs of a title search of real property that has escheated; and escheated.
(9) costs Costs of auction or sale under this Chapter.
All All other costs, including salaries of personnel, necessary to carry out the duties of the
Treasurer under this Chapter, shall be appropriated from the funds of the Escheat Fund pursuant
to the provisions of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.
(i) Records. – The State Treasurer must maintain the records it receives received from
holders who report unclaimed property in accordance with G.S. 116B-60. To protect the privacy
of the owners of unclaimed property, the only information that may be subject to public
inspection will be limited to is the information the State Treasurer is required to annually submit
to the clerks of superior court in accordance with G.S. 116B-62.
(j) Data Sharing. – On or before February 1 of each year, the North Carolina Division of
Motor Vehicles, Vehicles of the Department of Transportation, the North Carolina Department
of Revenue, and the Division of Employment Security (DES) of the North Carolina Department
of Commerce shall provide to the Treasurer, for the Treasurer's confidential use, information to
facilitate locating owners of unclaimed property. The Treasurer may shall not use any
information obtained pursuant to this section for any purpose except for locating owners of
unclaimed property."
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 51

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 87. G.S. 120-123 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-123. Service by members of the General Assembly on certain boards and
commissions.
No member of the General Assembly may shall serve on any of the following boards or
commissions:
…
(1b) The Rules Review Commission Commission, as established by
G.S. 143B-30.1.
…
(8a) The Genetic Engineering Review Board, as created by G.S. 106-769.
…
(15) The North Carolina Seafood Marine Industrial Park Authority, as established
by G.S. 113-315.25.
…
(18) The North Carolina Board of Science and Technology, Science, Technology,
and Innovation, as established by G.S. 143B-426.30.G.S. 143B-472.80.
…
(25a) The North Carolina Global TransPark Authority Authority, as established
under by G.S. 63A-3.
…
(28) The Social Services Commission, as established by
G.S. 143B-154.G.S. 143B-153.
(29) The North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs, as established by
G.S. 143B-407.G.S. 143B-404.
(30) The Wildlife Resources Commission, as established by G.S. 143-240.
(31) The North Carolina Council for Women, Women and Youth Involvement, as
established by G.S. 143B-393.
…
(32) The Board of Trustees of the North Carolina Museum of Art, as established
by G.S. 140-5.13.
(33) The North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission,
as established by G.S. 17E.G.S. 17E-3.
(33a) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 738, s. 41(d).
(34) The Board of Trustees of the North Carolina Public Employee Deferred
Compensation Plan, as established authorized by G.S. 143B-426.24.
(34a) Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 1024, s. 23(b).
(34b) The North Carolina Housing Partnership, as established by G.S. 122E-4.
(35) The Board of Trustees of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State
Employees, as established by G.S. 135-39.G.S. 135-48.20.
(36) Repealed by Session Laws 2004-199, s. 27(b), effective August 17, 2004.
(37) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners Examiners, as established by
G.S. 90-139.
…
(40) The Alarm System Security Systems Licensing Board, as established by
G.S. 74D-4.
(41) Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 1011, s. 2.1(c).
(42) The Crime Victims Compensation Commission, as established by G.S. 15B-3.
(43) The North Carolina Council on Ocean Affairs, as established by
G.S. 143B-390.10.
(44) The Child Care Commission, as established by G.S. 143B-168.3.Article 7 of
Chapter 110 of the General Statutes.
Page 52 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(45) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 517, s. 39, effective October 1, 1995.
(45a) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.38(c), effective July 1, 2015.
(46) The Board of Directors of the North Carolina Arboretum, as established in
G.S. 116-240.by G.S. 116-243.
(47) The North Carolina Agricultural Finance Authority, as established by
G.S. 122D-4.
(48) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(49) The Northeastern North Carolina Farmers Market Commission as established
by G.S. 106-720.
(50) The Southeastern North Carolina Farmers Market Commission as established
by G.S. 106-727.
(50a) The North Carolina Board of Dietetics/Nutrition Dietetics/Nutrition, as
created established by Article 25 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(51) The State Building Commission, as established by G.S. 143-135.25.
(52) The Commission on School Facility Needs, established by G.S. 115C-489.4.
(53) The North Carolina Marine Fisheries Commission Commission, as
established by G.S. 143B-289.51.
…
(58) The Appraisal Board created in Board, as established by G.S. 93E-1-5.
(59) Repealed by Session Laws 1997-286, s. 7.
(59a) The North Carolina Principal Fellows and TP3 Commission Commission, as
established by G.S. 116-74.41.
(60) Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 8.26b.
(61) The State Health Plan Purchasing Alliance Board, as established by
G.S. 143-625.
…
(64a) The North Carolina Educational Capital Facilities Finance Agency, as
established by G.S. 115E-4.G.S. 159D-38.
…
(68) The State Human Resources Commission.Commission, as established by
G.S. 126-2.
(69) The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., as established pursuant to
Part 10B of Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, and all local
partnerships established pursuant to this that Part.
(70) The Tobacco Trust Fund Commission Commission, as established in by
Article 75 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
(71) The Health and Wellness Trust Fund Commission established in Article 21 of
Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.
…
(74) The North Carolina Respiratory Care Board Board, as created established by
Article 37 38 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(75) The North Carolina Turnpike Authority.Authority, as established by
G.S. 136-89.182.
…
(78) The North Carolina State Lottery Commission, as established in by Chapter
18C of the General Statutes.
(79) Expired pursuant to 2010-31, s. 13.5(e), as amended by 2013-360, s. 14.2,
effective July 1, 2013.
(80) The Rural Infrastructure Authority, as created established by
G.S. 143B-472.128.
(81) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 7.14(d), effective July 1, 2016.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 53

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(82) The Domestic Violence Commission, as established in by Part 10C of Article
9 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
(83) The Governor's Crime Commission of the Department of Public Safety, as
established in by G.S. 143B-1100."
SECTION 87.1.(a) G.S. 143-52.1(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Reporting. – The State Procurement Officer shall provide a monthly report of all
contract awards greater than the benchmark established under G.S. 143-53.1 approved through
the Division of Purchase and Contract to the Cochairs of the Joint Legislative Committee
Commission on Governmental Operations. The report shall include the amount of the award, the
award recipient, the using agency, and a short description of the nature of the award."
SECTION 87.1.(b) G.S. 143-64.17G reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-64.17G. Report on guaranteed energy savings contracts entered into by local
governmental units.
A local governmental unit that enters into a guaranteed energy savings contract must report
the contract and the terms of the contract to the Local Government Commission and the State
Energy Office of the Department of Environmental Quality. The Commission shall compile the
information and report it biennially to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental
Operations. In compiling the information, the Local Government Commission shall include
information on the energy savings expected to be realized from a contract and, with the assistance
of the Office of State Construction and the State Energy Office, shall evaluate whether expected
savings have in fact been realized."
SECTION 87.1.(c) G.S. 143-128.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-128.3. Minority business participation administration.
(a) All public entities subject to G.S. 143-128.2 shall report to the Department of
Administration, Office of Historically Underutilized Business, the following with respect to each
building project:
(1) The verifiable percentage goal.
(2) The type and total dollar value of the project, minority business utilization by
minority business category, trade, total dollar value of contracts awarded to
each minority group for each project, the applicable good faith effort
guidelines or rules used to recruit minority business participation, and good
faith documentation accepted by the public entity from the successful bidder.
(3) The utilization of minority businesses under the various construction methods
under G.S. 143-128(a1).
The reports shall be in the format and contain the data prescribed by the Secretary of
Administration. The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges
shall report quarterly and all other public entities shall report semiannually. The Secretary of the
Department of Administration shall make reports every six months to the Joint Legislative
Committee Commission on Governmental Operations and the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government on information reported pursuant to this subsection.
…
(g) Annually, on or before September 1, beginning September 1, 2022, the Secretary shall
report findings and recommendations, as required under this section, to the Joint Legislative
Committee Commission on Governmental Operations and the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government and shall post the report findings and recommendations on
the Department's website."
SECTION 87.1.(d) G.S. 143-129(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) Procedure for Letting of Public Contracts. – The Department of Transportation
("DOT") and the Department of Administration ("DOA") shall monitor all projects in those
agencies that are let without a performance or payment bond to determine the number of defaults
on those projects, the cost to complete each defaulted project, and each project's contract price.
Page 54 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Beginning March 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, By March 1 of each year, DOT and DOA
shall report this information to the Joint Legislative Committee Commission on Governmental
Operations."
SECTION 87.1.(e) G.S. 143B-10(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Reorganization by Department Heads. – With the approval of the Governor, each
head of a principal State department may establish or abolish within his the department any
division. Each head of a principal State department may establish or abolish within his the
department any other administrative unit to achieve economy and efficiency and in accordance
with sound administrative principles, practices, and procedures except as otherwise provided by
law. When any such an act of the head of the principal State department affects existing law law,
the provisions of Article III, Sec. 5(10) of the Constitution of North Carolina shall be followed.
Each Department Head department head shall report all reorganizations under this subsection
to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairmen of the
Appropriations Committees in the Senate and the House of Representatives, and the Fiscal
Research Division of the Legislative Services Office, within 30 days after the reorganization if
the General Assembly is in session, otherwise to the Joint Legislative Committee on
Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office,
within 30 days after the reorganization. in the same manner as a Governor's report required under
G.S. 143B-12(b). The report shall include the rationale for the reorganization and any increased
efficiency in operations expected from the reorganization."
SECTION 87.1.(f) G.S. 143B-12(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The Governor shall report all transfers of departmental functions under this section to
the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairmen Chairs of
the Appropriations Committees in the Senate and the House of Representatives, and the Fiscal
Research Division of the Legislative Services Office, within 30 days after the transfer if the
General Assembly is in session, otherwise to the Joint Legislative Committee Commission on
Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office,
within 30 days after the transfer. The report shall include the rationale for the transfer and the
increased efficiency in operations expected from the transfer."
SECTION 88. Article 17 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 89. Article 75 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 75.
"Tobacco Trust Fund
"§ 143-715. Policy; purpose.
The General Assembly finds:finds the following:
…
(2) Tobacco producers, tobacco former allotment holders, and persons engaged
in tobacco-related businesses are entitled to indemnification for the adverse
economic effects in the State resulting from the Master Settlement Agreement,
tobacco producers, former allotment holders, and persons engaged in
tobacco-related businesses are entitled to compensation for the economic
losses resulting from lost quota in this State, and tobacco producers are
entitled to compensation for the decline in value of tobacco-related personal
property assets and declining market conditions in this State resulting from
the Master Settlement Agreement, to the extent that funds are available in the
Tobacco Trust Fund to address those purposes.
(3) Even in the absence of the Master Settlement Agreement, the tobacco-related
segment of the State's economy is experiencing severe economic hardship as
it confronts a national decline in the use of, and demand for, tobacco products,
which decline is expected to continue. At present, the tobacco producers,
tobacco former allotment holders, and persons engaged in tobacco-related
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 55

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
businesses are facing an economic crisis that threatens their health and
survival. Therefore, in addition to indemnification and compensation for
losses in this State resulting from the Master Settlement Agreement, the public
interest will be served by the funding of qualified agricultural programs that
support, foster, encourage, and facilitate a strong agricultural economy in
North Carolina. To the extent that funds are available in the Tobacco Trust
Fund, expenditure of those funds to finance qualified agricultural programs is
in the public interest.
…
"§ 143-716. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Commission. – The Tobacco Trust Fund Commission.
(2) Compensatory programs. – Programs developed by the Commission to
identify, locate, compensate, and indemnify tobacco producers, former
allotment holders, and persons engaged in tobacco-related businesses who
have suffered actual economic losses in this State due to lost quota, the decline
in value of tobacco-related personal property assets, and declining market
conditions resulting from the Master Settlement Agreement or declines in the
tobacco-related segment of the State's economy.
(3) Fund. – The Tobacco Trust Fund.
(4) Master Settlement Agreement. – The settlement agreement between certain
tobacco manufacturers and the states, as incorporated in the consent decree
entered in the action of State of North Carolina v. Philip Morris, Incorporated,
et al., 98 CVS 14377, in the General Court of Justice, Superior Court Division,
Wake County, North Carolina.
(5) National Tobacco Grower Settlement Trust. – The trust established by tobacco
companies to provide payments to tobacco growers and allotment holders in
14 states for the purposes of ameliorating potential adverse economic
consequences of likely reduction in demand, sales, and prices for tobacco as
an agricultural product as a result of the Master Settlement Agreement.
(6) Qualified agricultural programs. – Programs developed by the Commission to
support and foster the vitality and solvency of the tobacco-related segment of
the State's agricultural economy, particularly the segment adversely affected
by the Master Settlement Agreement, with the objective of alleviating and
avoiding unemployment, preserving, preserving and increasing local tax
bases, and encouraging the economic stability of participants in the State's
agricultural economy. Examples of qualified agricultural programs this term
include programs to finance the modernization of farming equipment,
programs to finance the conversion of existing equipment to conform to
environmental and other regulatory requirements, and programs to finance the
conversion or replacement of equipment in order to cultivate crops that are
more profitable than are currently being cultivated.cultivated, and programs
to establish farmers' markets serving communities where tobacco is or was
formerly grown.
(7) Tobacco product component business. – An individual, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, or other commercial entity that engages in the
manufacture of component products for use in the manufacture of tobacco
products.
(8) Tobacco-related business. – An individual, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, or other commercial entity that provides products or
services used directly in (i) the production of tobacco, tobacco or (ii) support
Page 56 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of the business of the production or sale of tobacco. The term does not include
the manufacturing of tobacco products or the sale of tobacco products at
wholesale or retail.
(9) Tobacco-related employment. – Employment in a tobacco-related business, or
in the manufacturing of tobacco products or the component products used in
the manufacture of tobacco products. The term does not include persons
employed in the sale of tobacco products at wholesale or retail.
"§ 143-717. Commission.
(a) Creation. – The Tobacco Trust Fund Commission is created. The Commission shall
be administratively located within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services but
shall exercise its powers independently of the Commissioner of Agriculture and the Department.
All administrative expenses of the Commission shall be paid from the Fund.
(b) Membership. – The Commission shall consist of 18 members. The Commission shall
be appointed as follows: six members by the Governor, six members by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, and six members by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The
members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) The Governor shall make the following appointments:
a. A flue-cured tobacco farmer.Two tobacco farmers.
b. A flue-cured tobacco farmer.Three at-large appointees.
c. A person in or displaced from tobacco-related employment.
d. An at-large appointee.
e. An at-large appointee.
f. An at-large appointee.
(2) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall make the following
appointments:
a. A flue-cured tobacco farmer.Three tobacco farmers.
b. A flue-cured tobacco farmer.Three at-large appointees.
c. A burley tobacco farmer.
d. An at-large appointee.
e. An at-large appointee.
f. An at-large appointee.
(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall make the following
appointments:
a. A flue-cured tobacco farmer.Two tobacco farmers.
b. A former flue-cured allotment holder who is not also a flue-cured
tobacco farmer.
c. A burley tobacco farmer.Three at-large appointees.
d. An at-large appointee.
e. An at-large appointee.
f. An at-large appointee.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the appointing authorities, in appointing
members, authorities shall appoint members who represent the geographic, political, gender, and
racial diversity of the State. It is the intent of the General Assembly that at least one-half of the
members of the Commission be tobacco farmers.
Except as provided for the initial members under subsection (c) of this section, members
Members shall serve four-year terms beginning July 1. No member may shall serve more than
two full consecutive terms. Members may continue to serve beyond their terms until their
successors are duly appointed, but any a holdover shall not affect the expiration date of the
succeeding term. Vacancies shall be filled by the designated appointing authority for the
remainder of the unexpired term. A member may be removed from office for cause by the
authority that appointed that member.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 57

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Initial Membership; Staggering. – To provide for a staggered membership, the
members initially appointed to the Commission shall be appointed to staggered terms. Of the
initial appointments to the Commission, the members initially appointed pursuant to
sub-subdivisions (b)(1)a., (1)b., (2)d., and (3)d. of this section shall serve one-year terms ending
on June 30, 2001. The members initially appointed pursuant to sub-subdivisions (b)(2)c., (2)e.,
(3)a., and (3)e. shall serve two-year terms ending on June 30, 2002. The members initially
appointed pursuant to sub-subdivisions (b)(1)c., (1)d., (1)e., (2)b., and (3)c. of this section shall
serve three-year terms ending June 30, 2003. The remaining members initially appointed
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall serve four-year terms ending June 30, 2004.
(d) Officers. – The Commission shall elect from its membership a chair, vice-chair, and
other officers as necessary for two-year terms beginning July 1 at the first meeting of the
Commission held on or after July 1 of every even-numbered year. The vice-chair may act for the
chair in the absence of the chair chair, as authorized by the Commission.
(e) Frequency of Meetings. – The Commission shall meet at least quarterly each year and
may hold special meetings at the call of the chair or a majority of members. The Governor shall
call the initial meeting of the Commission.
(f) Quorum; Majority. – Ten members shall constitute constitute a quorum of the
Commission. The Commission may act upon a majority vote of the members of the Commission
on matters involving the disbursement of funds and personnel matters properly before the
Commission. On all other matters, the Commission may act by a majority vote of the members
of the Commission present at a meeting at which a quorum is present.
(g) Per Diem and Expenses. – The members of the Commission shall receive per diem
and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
Per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses of the members shall be paid from the Fund.
(h) Conflict of Interest. – Members of the Commission shall comply with the provisions
of G.S. 14-234 prohibiting conflicts of interest, except that G.S. 14-234(a) shall does not apply
to an application for or the receipt of a grant or other financial assistance award by a member of
the Commission from the Fund created under this Article, or an entity in which a member of the
Commission has an interest, if both of the following conditions are met:
(1) A The member does not vote on, participate in the deliberation of, or otherwise
attempt through his or her official capacity to influence the vote on, on a grant
or other financial assistance award by the Commission to the member.
(2) The Commissioner of Agriculture determines that any an award to a the
member is in accordance with general criteria adopted by the Commission for
the distribution of funds from the Fund.
(i) Limit on Operating and Administrative Expenses. – All administrative expenses of
the Commission shall be paid from the Fund. No more than four hundred eighty-five thousand
dollars ($485,000) may shall be used each fiscal year for administrative and operating expenses
of the Commission and its staff, provided that staff. However, the Commission may annually
adjust the administrative expense cap imposed by this subsection, so long as that any the cap
increase does not exceed the amount necessary to provide for statewide salary and benefit
adjustments enacted by the General Assembly.
…
"§ 143-719. Tobacco Trust Fund; creation; investment; priority use.investment.
(a) Fund Established. – The Tobacco Trust Fund is established in the Office of the State
Treasurer. The Fund shall be used for the purposes provided in this Article.
(b) Fund Earnings, Assets, and Balances. – The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund
separate and apart from all other moneys, funds, and accounts. The State Treasurer is the
custodian of the Fund and shall invest the assets in accordance with G.S. 147-69.2 and
G.S. 147-69.3. Investment earnings credited to the Fund become part of the Fund. Any balance
remaining in the Fund at the end of any a fiscal year is carried forward in the Fund for the next
Page 58 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
succeeding fiscal year. Payments from the Fund shall be made on the warrant of by the chair of
the Commission, pursuant to the directives of the Commission.
(c) Priority Use of Funds. – As soon as practicable after the beginning of each fiscal year,
the State Treasurer must certify in writing to the chair of the Commission the estimated amount
of debt service anticipated to be paid during the fiscal year for special indebtedness authorized
by the State Capital Facilities Act of 2004, Part 1 of S.L. 2004-179. The chair of the Commission
must issue a warrant from the Fund to the General Fund for the lesser of (i) one-half of the amount
certified by the Treasurer and (ii) the applicable percentage of the Fund's receipts for the current
fiscal year. For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2007, the applicable percentage is thirty
percent (30%). For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2007, the applicable percentage is
sixty-five percent (65%).
"§ 143-720. Benefits and administration of Fund for compensatory programs.
(a) Funds held in the Fund may be expended on compensatory programs as provided in
this section.
(b) The Fund may provide direct and indirect financial assistance, in accordance with
criteria established by the Commission and to the extent allowed by law, to accomplish the
following:
(1) Indemnify tobacco producers, former allotment holders, and persons engaged
in tobacco-related businesses from the adverse economic effects in this State
of the Master Settlement Agreement.
(2) Compensate tobacco producers, former allotment holders, and persons
engaged in tobacco-related businesses for economic loss resulting from lost
quota and compensate tobacco producers for the decline in value of
tobacco-related personal property assets and declining market conditions
resulting from the Master Settlement Agreement in this State.
(3) Compensate individuals displaced from tobacco-related employment in this
State as a result of the adverse economic effects of the Master Settlement
Agreement.
(4) Compensate tobacco product component businesses that are (i) adversely
impacted by the Master Settlement Agreement and that (ii) need financial
assistance to retool machinery or equipment or to retrain workers, in order to
convert to the production of new products or nontobacco use of existing
products, or to effect other similar changes.
(c) Only tobacco producers, persons engaged in tobacco-related businesses, individuals
displaced from tobacco-related employment, and tobacco product component businesses in this
State, and former holders of North Carolina tobacco allotments allotments, are eligible to apply
for and receive assistance pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. Direct payments made to
tobacco producers, tobacco allotment holders, and persons engaged in tobacco-related businesses
shall be based on losses resulting in 1998 and thereafter. Lost quota shall be a primary
determinative factor in calculating the amount of compensable economic loss for tobacco
producers, former allotment holders, and persons engaged in tobacco-related businesses.
(d) The Commission shall determine the priority of awards among the categories in
subsection (b) of this section and within each of those categories.
(e) Financial assistance awards shall be for no more than one year at a time. An award
may be renewed annually, without limitation.
(f) The Commission may require applicants to provide copies of documents necessary to
determine compensable economic loss.
(g) In no event shall the amount paid to a tobacco producer or allotment holder pursuant
to this Article, when combined with the amount received through the National Tobacco Grower
Settlement Trust, exceed the compensable economic loss of the producer or allotment holder.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 59

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) The Commission may consider the criteria used for National Tobacco Grower
Settlement Trust payments and may correspond with the National Tobacco Grower Settlement
Trust certification entity to ensure that tobacco farmers and allotment holders are treated fairly.
…."
SECTION 90. G.S. 147-64.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 147-64.7. Authority.
(a) Access to Persons and Records. –
(1) The Auditor and the Auditor's authorized representatives shall have ready
access to persons and may examine and copy all books, records, reports,
vouchers, correspondence, files, personnel files, investments, and any other
documentation of any a State agency. Upon demand of the Auditor, access
shall extend to databases, datasets, and digital records necessary for any
purpose within the authority of the Auditor, including performing audits of
any type, assessing government efficiency, risk assessment, fraud detection,
audit planning, and evidence gathering. The review of State tax returns shall
be limited to matters of official business and the Auditor's report shall not
violate the confidentiality provisions of tax laws. Notwithstanding
confidentiality provisions of tax laws, the Auditor may use and disclose
information related to overdue tax debts in support of the Auditor's statutory
mission.
(2) For audits or investigations of a publicly funded entity conducted under
G.S. 147-64.6(c)(25), G.S. 147-64.6(c)(24), the Auditor and the Auditor's
duly authorized representatives shall have access to persons, records, papers,
reports, vouchers, correspondence, books, databases, datasets, digital records,
and any other documentation that is in the possession of any publicly funded
the entity which and that pertain to either of the following:
a. Amounts received pursuant to a grant or contract from the federal
government, the State, or its political subdivisions.
b. Amounts received, disbursed, or otherwise handled on behalf of the
federal government, the State, or its political subdivisions. In order to
determine that payments to providers of social and medical services
are legal and proper, the providers of these services shall give the
Auditor, or the Auditor's authorized representatives, access to the
records of recipients that receive these services.
(3) The Auditor shall, Auditor, for the purpose of examination and audit have
audit, has the authority, and will shall be provided ready access, to examine
and inspect all property, equipment, and facilities that are in the possession of
any a State agency or any that are in the possession of a publicly funded entity
which and were furnished or otherwise provided through grant, contract, or
any other type of funding by the State of North Carolina, Carolina or the
federal government. Audits and investigations of publicly funded entities are
limited as provided in G.S. 147-64.6(c)(25).G.S. 147-64.6(c)(24).
(4) All contracts or grants entered into by State agencies or political subdivisions
shall include, as a necessary part, a clause providing access as intended by this
section.
(5) The Auditor and the Auditor's authorized representatives may examine all
books and accounts of any individual, firm, or corporation only insofar as they
relate to transactions with any agency of the State.a State agency.
…
(b) Experts; Contracted Audits. –
Page 60 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The Auditor may obtain the services of independent public accountants,
qualified management consultants, or other professional persons and experts
as he the Auditor deems necessary or desirable to carry out the duties and
functions assigned under the act.this Article.
(2) No State agency may shall enter into any a contract for auditing services which
that may impact on the State's comprehensive annual financial report without
consultation with, and the prior written approval of, the Auditor, except in
instances where audits are called for by the Governor under G.S. 143C-2-1
and he shall so notify the Auditor. Auditor. The Auditor shall prescribe policy
and establish guidelines containing appropriate criteria for selection and use
of independent public accountants, qualified management consultants, or
other professional persons by State agencies and governing bodies to perform
all or part of the audit function.
(c) Authority to Administer Oaths, Subpoena Witnesses and Records, and Take
Depositions. –
(1) For the purposes of this Article the Auditor or his authorized representative
shall and the Auditor's authorized representatives have the power to subpoena
witnesses, to take testimony under oath, to cause the deposition of witnesses
(residing within or without the State) to be taken in a manner prescribed by
law, residing inside or outside the State, and to assemble records and
documents, by subpoena or otherwise. The subpoena power granted by this
section may be exercised only at the specific written direction of the Auditor
or his the Auditor's chief deputy.
(2) In case any If a person shall refuse refuses to obey a subpoena, subpoena
issued under this section, the Auditor shall invoke the aid of any North
Carolina court within the jurisdiction of which the investigation is carried on
or where such person may be, in requiring the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda,
contracts, agreements, and other records. Such petition a court to require the
person to obey the subpoena. The court may issue an order requiring such the
person to appear before the Auditor or officers designated by the Auditor,
there to produce records, if so ordered, or to give testimony touching about
the matter under investigation or in question; and any failure question. Failure
to obey such the order of the court may be punished by such court as a
contempt thereof.as contempt of court.
…."
SECTION 90.5.(a) G.S. 164-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 164-10. Supplements to the Publication of the General Statutes; rearrangement of laws,
laws and correction of errors.
(a) The Legislative Services Office shall have the following duties and powers with
regard to the supplements to the General Statutes:cause to be published, under its supervision, an
accurate transcription of all laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the General
Assembly, to be known as the General Statutes. In fulfilling this requirement, the Legislative
Services Office has the following duties:
(1) Within six months after the adjournment of each General Assembly, or as soon
thereafter as possible, the Legislative Services Office shall cause to be
published under its supervision, cumulative supplements to the General
Statutes, and any replacement or recompiled volumes thereof, which shall
contain an accurate transcription of all laws of a general and permanent nature
enacted by the General Assembly, the material contained in the next preceding
supplement, complete and accurate annotations to the statutes, appendix and
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 61

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
other material accumulated since the publication of the next preceding
supplement, and a cumulative index of said material.To include in one or more
publications of the General Statutes complete and accurate annotations to the
statutes, an index to the statutes, and other material the Legislative Services
Office considers necessary and proper.
(2) Periodically, every six months after the publication and issuance of a
cumulative supplement following a session of the General Assembly, or as
soon thereafter as possible, the Legislative Services Office shall cause to be
published an interim supplement containing all pertinent annotations and
other material found by the Legislative Services Office to be necessary and
proper, accumulating since the publication of the said cumulative supplement
or the last interim supplement.To periodically update the General Statutes to
include laws enacted since their most recent publication and to update
annotations to the General Statutes and other material the Legislative Services
Office considers necessary and proper.
(3) In the preparation of the general and permanent laws enacted by the General
Assembly the Legislative Services Office is hereby authorized:
(b) When preparing the General Statutes for publication, the Legislative Services Office
may take any of the following actions:
a.(1) To rearrange Rearrange the order of chapters, subchapters, articles, sections
and other divisions or subdivisions;sections, and subunits.
b.(2) To provide Provide titles for any such divisions or subdivisions and section
titles or catchlines when they are not provided by such laws;session law.
c.(3) To adopt Adopt a uniform system of lettering or numbering sections and the
various subdivisions thereof and to reletter or renumber sections and section
subdivisions provisions in accordance with such uniform system;the system.
d.(4) To rearrange Rearrange definitions in alphabetical order;order.
e.(5) To rearrange Rearrange lists of counties in alphabetical order; andorder.
f.(6) To make such Make any other changes in arrangement and form that do not
change the law as may be found by the Legislative Services Office and are
necessary for an accurate, clear clear, and orderly codification of such general
and permanent laws.the General Statutes."
SECTION 90.5.(b) G.S. 164-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 164-11. Supplements General Statutes prima facie statement of laws; method of
citation.laws.
(a) The supplements to the General Statutes of North Carolina, or to any replacement or
recompiled volumes of the General Statutes, and periodic updates to them, when printed
published under the supervision of the Legislative Services Office shall establish Office, establish
prima facie the general and permanent laws of North Carolina contained in said
supplements.Carolina.
(b) The cumulative pocket supplement may be cited as "G.S., Supp. 19 _____" and the
interim supplement may be cited as _____ G.S. In. Supp. 19 _____," the blank in front of "G.S."
to be filled in with the number of the interim supplement for that year."
SECTION 91.(a) Section 4 of S.L. 2005-384, as amended by Section 5 of S.L.
2006-255, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 4. Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act are effective when this act becomes law, except
that G.S. 130A-310.53, 130A-310.54(c), and 130A-310.55 become effective 1 July 2007. Section
2 of this act becomes effective 1 October 2005. Each vehicle manufacturer that is subject to the
requirements of this act shall provide the information required by G.S. 130A-310.52(b), either
individually or as a group of manufacturers, on or before 1 January 2007. This act expires on 1
July 2026."
Page 62 House Bill 1114-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 91.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 92.(a) Section 47(b) of S.L. 2025-25 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 47.(b) This section applies to conveyances executed before, on, or after the
effective date of this act.Part."
SECTION 92.(b) Section 48(e) of S.L. 2025-25 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 48.(e) G.S. 39-13.3(a)(1) and G.S. 41-63(4)a., as enacted by this section
regarding an elective life estate, apply to conveyances executed before, on, or after the effective
date of this act. Part. The remainder of this section applies to conveyances executed on or after
the effective date of this act.Part."
SECTION 92.(c) This section is retroactively effective July 26, 2025.
SECTION 93. Sections 5.2(d) and 7.2 of S.L. 2025-37 are repealed.
SECTION 94. Sections 2 and 3 of S.L. 2025-52 are repealed.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 95. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1114-Third Edition Page 63